_	The use of standard protocols and guidelines can significantly improve the quality of treatment and psychological support of victims, as well as the evidence that is collected.
_	From the evidence that could be gathered, it appeared Waterhouse and Connolly became lost in a rainstorm and hugged the coast of Baja California southward, thinking they were headed north along the Pacific Coast.
_	Robin Jones Gunn: “What I love about [Chuck’s] book is the evidence that God delights in accomplishing his purposes in his time and in his way with his children.
_	Despite the evidence that it was the advisers who contributed to the impact of Business Link, the Coalition government, elected in 2010, declared their intention to abolish the regional business adviser programs run by Business Link.
_	Validity describes the evidence that an assessment tool measures what it was supposed to measure.
_	The then Home Secretary Jack Straw refused to explain the reasoning for the pardon, stating "I will not set out all the evidence that has come to light.
_	Fearing that he might be caught, he hires a youthful criminal, Rocket Racer, to steal the evidence that incriminates him.
_	The girl’s father, Jean-Pierre Patonier, published a pamphlet, giving precise details of the evidence that had been provided to the coroner, denouncing the failure of the justice system.
_	He contradicted the evidence that the body of a woman could be seen in the cockpit.
_	The UN committee also requested that the Gendarmerie does not participate in the search and investigation of the disappearance and that the Argentine government protects all the evidence that may help to identify those responsible for the disappearance.
_	He had thus misdirected himself on the law as to the nature of the evidence that was required to be produced to prove the export of the goods.
_	He coined the term "ego depletion" to describe the evidence that humans' ability to self-regulate is limited, and after using it there is less ability (or energy) to self-regulate.
_	This is the evidence that the hypothesis H is true.
_	Sleep hygiene studies use different sets of sleep hygiene recommendations, and the evidence that improving sleep hygiene improves sleep quality is weak and inconclusive .
_	This ordinance seeks to reinforce the evidence that formerly incarcerated individuals can succeed if they are employed.
_	After a 26-year-old woman, Emma Brown, was found murdered, Martínez was arrested, largely on the evidence that he had been seen speaking to Brown at the general store the day of the murder.
_	Werd supports Lorak's plan, particularly in light of the evidence that nothing short of a prepared assault will be enough to contend with the humans.
_	Experts on 41 languages from across the world were given a uniform vocabulary list and asked to provide the words for each item in the language on which they were an expert, as well as information on how strong the evidence that each word was borrowed was.
_	Thus, this supports the evidence that MHC diversity is crucial for the long-term reproductive success of the parents, as the tradeoff for an initial decrease in short-term reproductive fitness is mediated by the survival of a few of their offspring in a variable environment.
_	Where the plaintiff has shown intentional discrimination in a mixed motive case, the defendant can still avoid liability for money damages by demonstrating by a preponderance of the evidence that the same decision would have been made even in the absence of the impermissible motivating factor.
_	Underlying this method is the evidence that the cartilage bends itself convexly to the opposite side after scratching or scoring.
_	It is believed that the published work of this project was primarily Lewis', based on the evidence that after his death in 1811, no further translations appeared.
_	It is clear from the evidence that the Sonae permit to work issuer/supervisor had not been given or undertaken specific training, or provided with sufficient supervision, in the permit to work procedure prior to December 7, 2010.
_	Like many other divinities and heroes, he had been nursed by nymphs, but the evidence that he himself received cult devotion among the Greeks is sparse.
_	Spreading out across the world to Argentina and India they gather the evidence that shows that their father was a victim of a major arms dealer and triumph over him in a final confrontation in the Egyptian city of Alexandria.
_	That's the evidence that will prove to you that defendant Stephanie Lazarus murdered Sherri Rasmussen."
_	The Court of Appeals held that the defendant carried the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that he had legitimate reasons for the employment decision, and that others promoted and hired were better qualified than the plaintiff.
_	The differences in the internal system levels is the evidence that Eysenck used to explain the differences between the introverted and the extroverted.
_	In July 2008, a special commission of the Legislative Assembly of Rio Grande do Sul, Goulart's home state, concluded that "the evidence that Jango was willfully assassinated, with knowledge of the Geisel government, is strong."
_	"…the effort detailed in this report is a response to the evidence that Nunavut is especially vulnerable to the long-range air transport of dioxin.
_	Initially, the CBI considered the possibility of a conspiracy to destroy the evidence that Aarushi might have been sexually assaulted or had consensual intercourse prior to her death.
_	This is supported by the evidence that gorillas and chimpanzees differ in their knuckle-walking related wrist anatomy and in the biomechanics of their knuckle-walking.
_	Evidence of human occupation levels further back-up the evidence that the site was not fully inundated throughout prehistory.
_	What this means is that the vast majority of American school children will continue to be indoctrinated in evolutionism and will be denied the right and freedom to hear the evidence that points to creationism."
_	An assize of seven earls and fourteen lesser nobles heard the evidence that linked the prisoners to the rebellion in the Lennox—in a trial lasting just one day the four men were found guilty of treason.
_	Jack, Michelle and Tony race to find the evidence that the recording is a forgery, resulting in the discovery that a group of European and American businessmen fabricated it in order to wage war with the Middle East, and planned to benefit from the resulting skyrocketing oil prices.
_	Reliable conclusions are based on the quality of sources, ideally original records, the information within those sources, ideally primary or firsthand information, and the evidence that can be drawn, directly or indirectly, from that information.
_	By September 2007 the Washington DC court ruled that the evidence that formed the basis of the summaries had to be made available.
_	An 1885 fire which gutted the courthouse and much of the town of Hamilton, however, marked the end of the prosperity and "removed most of the evidence that a rich camp had ever existed there".
_	This hypothesis is not consistent with the evidence that most of the hominid evolution took place in savanna environment and not in tropical rainforests.
_	The National Press Photographers' Association noted: "The university’s office of institutional equity and compliance told the student that it found by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent had sexually harassed the student by making unwanted sexual comments about her, and in doing so created a hostile environment for the student."
_	He presents the men with the evidence that his machine was deliberately tampered with, and Lembach allows him to have another chance.
_	Given the evidence that social anxiety disorder may predict subsequent development of other psychiatric disorders such as depression, early diagnosis and treatment is important.
_	The first few chapters following the brief introduction about Bundy's birth and family describe Rule's friendship with Bundy, her first impressions of him, and her reluctance to consider the evidence that he might be responsible for the crimes of which he was accused.
_	In June 2010 the evidence that was found in Freshwater's classroom in 2008, only a few months after he was suspended, was revealed to the public.
_	Sung-shik out of his daze, takes the gun from him and kills the still-alive officer, then persuades Soo-hyeok and Sung-shik to flee with a false alibi of being kidnapped, before throwing away the evidence that he and Woo-jin were fraternizing with Southern soldiers.
_	He agrees to provide the evidence that will get Daniel out of prison, if she has sex with him.
_	Despite the evidence that the attackers came from across the Egyptian border the IDF launched a reprisal raid against Nahalin in the West Bank.
_	When Cliff Barnes has a case against J.R. concerning the counter revolution in South East Asia, Afton plots with J.R. to drug Cliff so J.R. can get his hands on the evidence that connects J.R. to a counter-revolution.
_	He was mentally occupied with the task of finishing his Requiem, but the evidence that he actually dictated passages to his student Franz Xaver Süssmayr is minimal.
_	The trials began in May, with testimony from dental specialists supplementing the evidence that had been provided by the prison witnesses.
_	Owners sometimes reduce the evidence that their high-performance car is such by removing characteristic badging.
_	The discovery of this hoard contributes to the evidence that the Isle of Wight was occupied by the Celtic tribe, the Durotriges, during the Late Iron Age.
_	Castle Chamber accepted the evidence that he had beaten his wife so severely that she was in fear of her life, while Jane had died soon after a similar beating, and probably as a direct result of it.
_	Even more grave was the evidence that he had beaten his 13-year-old daughter Jane so badly that she died as a result- "some said he gave her forty strokes, some said sixty, on her bare back".
_	This increase in blood flow is potentially related to the evidence that atrophy heightens blood flow and metabolism, which is measured as the BOLD response, or blood-oxygen-level dependence, with fMRI.
_	Katrina, finding out that Crane suspects her father, burns all the evidence that Crane has accumulated.
_	Audrey seems to have had more than one past life, for, beside the evidence that she is in fact Lucy Ripley, in Fear and Loathing there is another woman apparently from the past who looks like Audrey and Lucy.
_	Sir Francis Bond Head later boasted that despite the evidence that poured in from every district in the Province he allowed Mackenzie to prepare a revolt.
_	As for Richard's physical appearance, most contemporary descriptions bear out the evidence that aside from having one shoulder higher than the other (with chronicler Rous not able to correctly remember which one, as slight as the difference was), Richard had no other noticeable bodily deformity.
_	By September 2007 the Washington DC court ruled that the evidence that formed the basis of the summaries had to be made available.
_	Scientific publications brought the evidence that there was a lack of news drugs for diseases that cause high mortality and morbidity among people living in poor areas.
_	Burns was offended by accusations from labor supporters that he had planted the evidence that he had seized at the union headquarters in Indianapolis.
_	He was tried again when Bill Baxley, the state attorney general of Alabama, realized that much of the evidence that the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) had against Chambliss was not used in his original trial.
_	In effect, the act of the couple representing themselves to others as being married, and organizing their relation as if they were married, acts as the evidence that they are married.
_	It appeared from the evidence that the defendant refused to do the work ordered, had not worked for a week.
_	Known as the "Saints", the alliance was led by the best known of the anti-slave trade campaigners, William Wilberforce, who had taken on the cause of abolition in 1787 after having read the evidence that Thomas Clarkson had amassed against the trade.
_	Ignoring all the evidence that the Guangxi Army had been decisively defeated, and convinced that the 2nd Brigade would be encircled if it remained where it was, he took the controversial decision to abandon Lạng Sơn and fall back to stronger defensive positions at Kep and Chu.
_	Although research has shown high rates of use of complementary and alternative therapies for children with autism, including gluten or casein exclusion diets, the evidence that such diets have any impact on behavior or cognitive and social functioning in autistic children was limited and weak.
_	Peng met with Khrushchev on May 24, and was criticized during the Cultural Revolution for having criticized Mao's leadership to the Soviet leader, but the evidence that Peng criticized Mao to Khrushchev is very circumstantial, and Mao did not mention this during his efforts to have Peng purged.
_	The court also wrote that the evidence that Baker was the shooter "was not overwhelming."
_	Now the evidence that this last has virtually been hitherto left undone and even reversed, is found on careful examination to be overwhelming.'
_	Amit begins to receive anonymous threats to hand over the evidence that he has.
_	Some are favoured more than others because of the evidence that supports them.
_	It is a controversial effort in the United States intended to increase the number of deaf children who use American Sign Language, in spite of the evidence that introduction of American Sign Language can impair the ability of young deaf children with cochlear implants to meet typical spoken language milestones.
_	The boys decide to get the evidence that will clear Wallace before the police move in.
_	At a meeting on December 12, 2002, he assured Bush that the evidence that Iraq had WMDs amounted to a "slam dunk case."
_	In essence, a mock trial is held: a jury is selected and, in some cases, presented with the evidence that would be used at a real trial.
_	According to Avery it is clear from the evidence that no non–Anglo-Saxon leader played a particularly significant role in the strike.
_	As a result, much of the evidence that the prosecution presented to help the boy’s account was not admitted.
_	Based on the evidence that well planned vegan diets can be lower in unhealthy processed foods than the standard American diet, some studies have investigated vegan interventions as a possible treatment for Type 2 Diabetes.
_	Among the evidence that Cumbric served as a substratum that influenced local English dialects are a group of counting systems, or scores, recorded in various parts of northern England.
_	Experts noted the evidence that violence against women and girls is intensified and exacerbated in situations of socio-economic stress, conflict and other crisis situations.
_	Moreover, according to the author, the Quran contained prophecies and those prophecies which had been fulfilled up until the time of this commentary, constituted an important part of the evidence that it was the revealed word of God.
_	Similar to the crystalline axis model, this model faces the same challenges with respect to the evidence that supports the passive margin model.
_	Officials later acknowledged, however, "that the evidence that prompted President Clinton to order the missile strike on the Shifa plant was not as solid as first portrayed.
_	Finally, the obituary states that Richard's father died when he was only 12 months old and this appears to contradict much of the evidence that has been collected.
_	Cate gives evidence to the prosecutor who can convict Lacey, then conspires with the prosecutor; the two of them agree to keep it a secret so that she won't be disbarred, which would deny him the ability to use the evidence that he should not have.
_	The prosecutor did not lead the evidence that had been obtained without a warrant.
_	They succeed in finding the evidence that proves John was framed, and get him released.
_	He later added to this argument the evidence that most paralogous genes in vertebrates do not demonstrate genetic linkage.
_	This is further supported by the evidence that females that reproduce are not observed the following year.
_	Elsewhere on the same lode or vein, if it extended beyond the point in controversy, any other citizen could make a valid location, for this notice, specifying no bounds or limits, could not be said to have any extent beyond what would be necessary for sinking a shaft," and also that to entitle the plaintiff to recover, "it should appear from the evidence that Boaro entered at the very place which had been taken by Carroll, because, as Carroll's notice failed to specify the territory he wished to take, it could not refer to or embrace any other place than that in which it was planted."
_	The Seventh Circuit took no position on whether the evidence that Boika submitted warranted reopening.
_	In the real-life case to which DeNoon refers, the evidence that was not introduced in the 2005 trial was introduced in the 2 1994 grand jury hearings after the civil settlement for the civil case.
_	"Rejecting a plausible but unproven hypothesis too early tends to bias the subsequent analysis, because one does not then look for the evidence that might support it.
_	Guilty of her actions, Laurie emails Analise's friend Amy the evidence that is needed to prove that the SUV Quin was driving was the one which hit Analise.
_	The inquiry's lead counsel stated that "anyone from Wettlaufer to Premier Kathleen Wynne" may be called to testify before the inquiry based on the evidence that is uncovered.
_	The presiding justice wrote, "It is clear from the evidence that Macdonald was known for his anti-Semitic, racist views and friends, and for being at least an admirer of the KKK.
_	In September 1949, he was appointed to head a scientific panel that included Oppenheimer to review the evidence that the Soviet Union had tested its first atomic bomb.
_	Mike Abel, the only Canadian to die in the Somali operation, was alleged a member of the KKK; although colleagues disputed the evidence that racist literature had been found in his belongings, pointing out that it just floated around the camp and everybody read it.
_	Grant Keddie, Curator of Archeology at the Royal BC Museum, examined a photograph of a coin from Cassiar taken in the 1940s (whereabouts now unknown) and he believes that the character style and the evidence that it was machine-ground show it to be a 19th-century copy of a Ming Dynasty temple token.
_	As a result of two legal cases ("Martinez v. Astrue" and "Clark v. Astrue"), the SSA may not suspend benefits based merely on the evidence that a warrant had been issued.
_	Read in this light, the evidence that Florensky's thinking actively responded to the art of the Russian modernists.
_	However, Simpson's death in 1669 is at odds with the evidence that the Jesuit Simpson lived until 1674.
_	The Cusichaca valley is an archaeologically important region in Peru, significant for the evidence that it has provided of Inca civilization.
_	The structure was completed when Johannes Kepler wrote the book "Astronomia nova" ("A new astronomy") in 1609, setting out the evidence that planets move in elliptical orbits with the sun at one focus, and that planets do not move with constant speed along this orbit.
_	Most presentations tried either to advance a model in some way or at least to honestly review the evidence that needs explaining.
_	In 2001 a fossil of a dinosaur was found in Agudos and after the analysis of its skeleton, it was reported to be a new species of ornithischian dinosaur, named sacisaur ("Sacisaurus agudoensis") after the evidence that the skeleton missed the bones of one of its leg.
_	The FDA also noted "Of the 10 intervention studies that formed the basis of FDA's evaluation, all were seriously flawed or limited in their reliability in one or more ways", concluding that "most of the evidence does not support a relationship between phosphatidylserine and reduced risk of dementia or cognitive dysfunction, and that the evidence that does support such a relationship is very limited and preliminary".
_	He decided that if he burned down the Worth County Courthouse, then the evidence that had been seized during his arrest could not be used against him in court.
_	A chase ensues, ending with Nick being cornered finding the evidence that cements Butler's guilt.
_	By the time Dowling could seize Amarillo and Snyder, the Confederates destroyed the camp and most of the evidence that was there.
_	There are ongoing initiatives to define the evidence that supports the list.
_	Hart is also taken to be the father of the acclaimed Restoration actor Charles Hart, largely on the evidence that the two were members of the King's Men.
_	Langlois however claims that much of the evidence that had already been gathered was flimsy or unverifiable and that there seemed to be a lot of conspiracy theories.
_	After returning to the Batcave and apologizing for his past actions, Batman reveals to the Batman Family that the murderer is David Cain, which he had deduced based solely on the evidence that Batgirl found earlier; the nerve strike that was used to immobilize Vesper is one that Bruce learned from Cain.
_	In January 2006, Minister Lutsenko admitted that the MVS is in possession of the evidence that would allow them to question and charge ex-President Leonid Kuchma in a privatisation wrongdoing case, if only the MVS had the authority for starting such a case autonomously.
_	Freud had a lot of data as evidence for the seduction theory, but rather than presenting the actual data on which he based his conclusions (his clinical cases and what he had learned from them) or the methods he used to acquire the data (his psychoanalytic technique), he instead addressed only the evidence that the data he reportedly acquired were accurate (that he had discovered genuine abuse).
_	the evidence that musquito did end up dead and killed many people is the the darwin museum
_	Thus, the appeals court reversed the district court's order suppressing the evidence that was found as the fruit of Willman's illegal, but private, search.
_	In general, the purpose of rules of evidence is to regulate the evidence that the jury may use to reach a verdict.
_	The court disagreed, finding on the evidence that, instead of leaving everything to her husband, and thereby paying a purely passive role in the identification, she could herself have asked the one question required to establish Sacks's identity.
_	Thus, the evidence that survived throughout the years includes written records such as royal and votive inscriptions, literary texts, and lists of year-names.
_	... doubts about the quality of some of the evidence that the United States is using to make its case that Iraq is trying to build a nuclear bomb emerged Thursday.
_	The critical apparatus presents the author's work in three parts: first, a list or description of the evidence that the editor used (names of manuscripts, or abbreviations called sigla); second, the editor's analysis of that evidence (sometimes a simple likelihood rating),; and third, a record of rejected variants of the text (often in order of preference).
_	To Archie, Wolfe admits that despite knowing the murderer's identity, the evidence that will enable him to prove it has been efficiently destroyed.
_	The show concentrates on the evidence that Shakespeare was a Catholic and consists of thirteen episodes.
_	According to the "Encyclopædia Britannica" (1911), it was only a few months before his death that Anastasia died; however, this is flatly contradicted by the evidence that Anastasia, Countess of Peterborough and Monmouth, survived until 1755 and that the purported second marriage ceremony never took place in 1735.
_	US Representatives John R. Carter and Michael T. McCaul wrote, "Based on all the facts, it is inconceivable to us that the DOD and the Army continue to label this attack 'workplace violence' in spite of all the evidence that clearly proves the Fort Hood shooting was an act of terror."
_	An editorial in the "Los Angeles Times" credited Hedges for his persistence in finding the evidence that another man had confessed to the murder that had been used to justify the death penalty for Miranda, lamenting the fact that "Most of the 669 people on San Quentin's death row aren't nearly as lucky".
_	Kang is forced to compromise his professional ethics and tamper with the evidence that must lead to Lee's release from custody within three days, or else Kang's daughter will be killed.
_	The Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention (China CDC) have conducted research that supports the evidence that "there was and is still a huge bottleneck to ensure the delivery of the timely birth dosage to home births".
_	The legal burden of proof () is the obligation of a party in a trial to produce the evidence that will prove the claims they have made against the other party.
_	Their accounts were not consistent with the evidence that they gave at Sheppard's trial, but Blueskin was convicted anyway.
_	Through the old method of vampiring, Mrs. Copley succeeds in securing the evidence that frees her husband and puts Blake behind bars.
_	In the wake of the 2005 Kitzmiller v. Dover Area School District trial, he wrote a review with Nick Matzke, outlining the evidence that the bacterial flagellum is an evolved rather than designed entity
_	Kaminsky and Reinhart (2000) document the evidence that trade links in goods and services and exposure to a common creditor can explain earlier crises clusters, not only the debt crisis of the early 1980s and 1990s, but also the observed historical pattern of contagion.
_	The American Enterprise Institute reported in September 2011 that: "...the evidence that the quality of a nation's education system is a key determinant of the future growth of its economy is increasingly strong."
_	Despite the evidence that moderately complex animals (triploblastic bilaterians) existed before and possibly long before the start of the Cambrian, it seems that the pace of evolution was exceptionally fast in the early Cambrian.
_	The Commission noted a window of time between the morning of September 25 and the early morning of September 26 for which they could not account, but stated that it was not plausible or supported by the evidence that Oswald took a car, bus, or airplane from New Orleans to Dallas to see Odio, then back to Houston where he departed for Laredo in that period of time.
_	Its intention was to summarize the evidence that the over-consumption of sugar was leading to a greatly increased incidence of coronary thrombosis, and that in addition it was certainly involved in dental caries, probably involved in obesity, diabetes and liver disease, and possibly involved in gout, dyspepsia and some cancers.
_	While the evidence that schreckstoff attracts predators is mixed, studies indicate multiple predators will interfere with each other and prey can recover from predation events when they manage to escape.
_	He further argues that the evidence that selfish tendencies are natural must not be taken as evidence that selfishness is right.
_	On January 14, 2009, U.S. District Judge Richard J. Leon ordered the release of Gharani because the evidence that he was an enemy combatant was mostly limited to statements from two other detainees whose credibility had been called into question by US government staff.
_	After Taylor and Nova depart, Zaius destroys the cave holding the evidence that would exonerate Cornelius and Zira, and takes them back to Ape City under escort.
_	Coulondre stated that the fact that China had not collapsed in 1937 in the face of the Japanese invasion together with the evidence that stiffening Chinese resistance had led Japan to become bogged down in China meant the Soviets could "make a corresponding greater effort in the West".
_	This petition laid out new developments in the evidence that had not been known when the first petition was denied in 2004.
_	Twenty-seven different risk assessments of the evidence that trichloroethylene causes cancer have come to substantially different conclusions.
_	When, however, the evidence regarding the clothing, the purchaser and the timer is taken with the evidence that an unaccompanied bag was taken from KM180 to PA103A, the inference that that was the primary suitcase becomes, in our view, irresistible.
_	Later that night, Jax and the club meet with the IRA council to present the evidence that Jimmy has flipped and learns that it will not be he who kills Jimmy.
_	ISO/IEC 15504 is the reference model for the maturity models (consisting of capability levels which in turn consist of the process attributes and further consist of generic practices) against which the assessors can place the evidence that they collect during their assessment, so that the assessors can give an overall determination of the organization's capabilities for delivering products (software, systems, and IT services).<ref name="ISO/IEC 15504-2 Clause 5">ISO/IEC 15504-2 Clause 5</ref>
_	The Supreme Court granted certiorari to determine whether the evidence that was not disclosed required a new trial under the due process criteria that had been enunciated in "Napue v. Illinois" and "Brady v. Maryland".
_	Presence of iron ore and quartzite provide the evidence that iron smelting in a crude form was performed here.
_	The implications of this array of evidence is important due to the evidence that the “broad spectrum” of plant use is not unique to "Homo sapiens".
_	At a press conference on May 1, 2015, U.S. Attorney Paul J. Fishman stated that, based upon the evidence that was available, his office would not bring any more charges in the case.
_	Dexter is released, however, thanks to the evidence that Debra tampered with.
_	In the absence of a specimen, Rothschild scientifically described and named it as a separate species based on the evidence that violet macaws were said to have inhabited the island of Guadeloupe; however, they were probably hyacinth macaws imported from the mainland of South America.
_	The Court held that a reasonable person could conclude on the evidence that Uncol had aided and abetted the abuses committed by the Myanmar Military and court drew on the jurisprudence of the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia (ICTY) for its decision.
_	The police corroborated the evidence that not every couple was asked this with the anecdote that a woman once left the club "upset with her partner".
_	The similarity in three-dimensional structures supports the evidence that many of the families do share common ancestry with others.
_	All of the evidence that prosecutors presented was circumstantial.
_	He did not release the evidence that led him to this conclusion.
_	This is the evidence that in Purworejo, Muslim and Christians are being accepted harmoniously by its people.
_	He suggests that given the evidence that households where mothers control the purse-strings spend more on their children, it is mothers who ought to be given the proxy vote until the child comes of age.
_	"Changyuraptor" and other microraptorines add to the evidence that dinosaurs had evolved a host of morphological features and behaviours such as feathers, hollow bones, nesting behaviour, and possibly flight, before they evolved in birds.
_	"The weight of the evidence that the Vela event was an Israeli nuclear test assisted by South Africa appears overwhelming."
_	This is in spite of the evidence that the rebellion involved participants from various social classes, had support from hundreds of civilians, and used visual symbols (such as armbands and flags) and a proclamation demanding the end of the French rule.
_	Where is the evidence that this kind of text really existed elsewhere in the ancient world?
_	All of these factors, combined with molecular data from phylogenetic analysis, contribute to the evidence that "D. regia" possesses some of the most ancient characteristics within the genus.
_	The police raid set off the crisis that ultimately led to the "Anschluss" as the Austrian Chancellor Kurt von Schuschnigg now took up the invitation to meet Hitler to confront him with the evidence that the Austrian Nazis had been planning a "putsch" contrary to the Austro-German treaty of 1936.
_	A thousand years ago, he returned to Mata Nui and told his fellow Toa about the evidence that they were really meant to be heroes.
_	After all the evidence that had been heard, the Commissioners stated that the question as to who was to blame resolved itself into a simple issue, namely which of the two ships changed her course during the fog.
_	Part of the evidence that komatiites are not magnesium-rich simply because of cumulate olivine is textural: some contain spinifex texture, a texture attributable to rapid crystallization of the olivine in a thermal gradient in the upper part of a lava flow.
_	(Also see the "DNA damage theory of aging" for a discussion of the evidence that DNA damage is the primary underlying cause of aging.)
_	Chuck it might have been a lie and he says he needs to believe that there's a cure out there but at least they got the evidence that Phenotrans was responsible for the Fortune City Outbreak and says nobody is gonna take their word for what was going on in that place, as they continue watching the Facility's destruction Frank's watch beeps and he realizes that he left his Zombrex in the Directors office earlier as he looks like he is about to accept his fate, Chuck gives him the same zombrex he threw away earlier and Tells him "Take it, The world needs Frank West" and they take one last looks at the Facility's Destruction.
_	According to documents collected by the Prosecutor's Office in Warsaw, the evidence that Jan Kobylański was the perpetrator in the denunciation of the Szenkers family cannot be proved.
_	These fragments provide the evidence that he was in office under this king.
_	His private papers, including his correspondence with his wife, have not survived, and the evidence that does exist in the Moscow State archives, the most important repository of Romanov papers, is open to interpretation.
_	To support this claim, he points to the evidence that political leanings influence whether one accepts the scientific consensus on climate-change.
_	Part I, comprising the first four chapters of the book, reviews the science of climate change, setting forth the evidence that humans are causing an unprecedented increase in carbon emissions that is, in turn causing global warming.
_	In 1850 Stas gave the evidence that the Belgian Count Hippolyte Visart de Bocarmé killed his brother-in-law by poisoning with nicotine.
_	In this case, the evidence that Huddleston knew that the televisions were stolen was "probative" of whether he knew that the videocassettes were stolen.
_	Several archaeological discoveries give the evidence that Este was an important centre of Venetic culture from the 7th to the 4th century BC.
_	Aglukkaq was criticized by public health officials for refusing to sign the Vienna Declaration on drug policy reform, which deemed "the evidence that law enforcement has failed to prevent the availability of illegal drugs [...] unambiguous," and called for a "science-based approach" based on harm reduction strategies such as needle exchange programs and supervised injection sites, because the Declaration was in conflict with the Conservative government's long-established prohibition-centered approach.
_	In a web television interview after his arrest, the page owner said that the evidence that led the e-crimes bureau of the Greek police to him were all provided by Facebook.
_	Also on that day, he and Kevin Zeese authored an op-ed for the "Boston Globe" to support the call for impeachment against Bush, citing the memo as part of the evidence that the possibility of deliberate deception by the administration should be investigated.
_	In 1974, Davanloo showed his tapes of Intensive Short-Term Dynamic Psychotherapy to Malan who was convinced by the evidence that the technique used was extremely effective.
_	In this case, at a post-trial hearing, the judge found by a preponderance of the evidence that Cunningham's victim was particularly vulnerable and that his conduct was violent, making him a danger to the community.
_	Noah admits the evidence of this correlation is "circumstantial rather than direct", but so is "the evidence that smoking is a leading cause of lung cancer."
_	Lewin, in turn, counters that the harassment charges were just a small part of the evidence that Herzfeld’s conduct as a SkyMax employee was inappropriate.
_	Another peculiarity is the evidence that the people behind the mummification process were trying to repair and cover injured areas of the body.
_	Consider the evidence that all emeralds examined thus far have been green.
_	In parallel with the repair work, teams of archaeologists studied the evidence that was being revealed.
_	Carrot the evidence that he is the royal heir, upon which Carrot kills Cruces with his sword and has both the evidence and the dismantled gonne buried with Cuddy.
_	Frank was sentenced to death but Governor Slaton was convinced after a review of the evidence that Frank was innocent, so he commuted the sentence to life in prison.
_	Adalward could only supply evidence of accreditation by the Archbishop of Hamburg-Bremen, whereas Osmund claimed that his own authority came from the papacy, and presumably was able to produce convincing documentation to that effect, though it emerged from examination of the evidence that he had not actually received ordination at Rome, but from 'a certain archbishop of Poland'.
_	The appellate court ruled that the report was highly relevant in that "A reasonable inference may be drawn from the evidence that despite management's knowledge that the Pinto's fuel system could be made safe at a cost of but $4 to $8 per car, it decided to defer corrective measures to save money and enhance profits."
_	During cross-examination, Irving was unable to undermine either Evans, who had been highly critical of his scholarship or van Pelt, whose report concentrated on the evidence that contradicted the holocaust deniers' arguments about Auschwitz Birkenau.
_	Even with the evidence that Cain has been hurting her family, Priya refuses to believe that he has done anything wrong.
_	She questioned the evidence that the spy was female, and noted that "Up until the day she died she had photographs of Liam Mellows, Liam Brady and Rory O'Connor on her bedside and she revered them.
_	On the evidence that it is morphologically distinct, BirdLife International (and hence the IUCN Red List) recognised it as a species, and it was listed in the IOC World Bird List from December 2009.
_	Shane demands that the team find evidence to prove Ian's innocence in return for the evidence that will exonerate Hawkes.
_	Declan then tries to find Allison and explain his innocence by offering to show her the evidence that would exonerate him.
_	Validity describes the evidence that an assessment tool measures what it was supposed to measure.
_	In addition to the evidence that humans have a natural propensity towards sugar, there exists additional biological plausibility that explains the correlation of sugar-sweetened beverage consumption and obesity.
_	As regards the contents or terms of the written agreement, however, there is a very definite rule of law, known as the parol evidence rule, which places strict limits on the evidence that may be adduced in aid of interpretation.
_	Farnesol is subject to restrictions on its use in perfumery as some people may become sensitised to it, however the evidence that farnesol can cause an allergic reaction in humans is disputed.
_	A 2016 Cochrane review found that since the previous version of that review was published in 2010, the evidence that smoking bans improved health outcomes had become more robust, especially with respect to acute coronary syndrome admissions.
_	Watson filed a pre-trial motion to suppress against the evidence that was found in his car, claiming that there was a lack of probable cause and that him saying,"Go ahead." was involuntary, due to him not being told that he could withhold consent.
_	The BNDT stresses the evidence that the process of niche differentiation is strictly addressed by species.
_	She authored "Huna, Max Freedom Long and the Idealization of William Brigham" for the peer-reviewed "Hawaiian Journal of History", detailing the evidence that Long did not meet Brigham, who he cited as his primary resource for his Huna books, and that even if they did meet, Brigham was not a reliable source on Hawaiian religion or spiritual traditions.
_	The arguments BIA made against recognizing the Muwekma Ohlone have been contested by the tribe, but even without the evidence that the tribe has put forth contradicting BIA’s claims, the Final Determination completely fails to acknowledge the unique historical circumstances that prevented the Indians of California like the Muwekma Ohlone from conforming to the rigid criteria of the FAP.
_	During a pre-trial hearing, Wilson filed a motion to suppress against the evidence that was found during the search.
_	Foremost among the play's historical inspirations is the evidence that the Nazi regime had a program at the Danzig Anatomic Institute in 1944 to develop a process for the mass-production of soap from the fat of Jews being slaughtered in Nazi extermination camps, and produced soap in small quantities at a nearby concentration camp.
_	It was Charles Paget, who Mary, Queen of Scots had written to from her imprisonment in code; this letter was part of the evidence that caused her execution.
_	He based his conclusions on the evidence that transitional tetrapod fossils are consistently found in habitats that were formerly humid and wooded floodplains.
_	It is now in the process of creating "evidence-based algorithms," that is algorithms created by experts and annotated with the evidence that leads to these algorithms.
_	Although the Cabinet voted to reaffirm that South African AIDS policy is based on the evidence that HIV causes AIDS, former President Thabo Mbeki continued to support the AIDS denialist position, as did his Minister of Health, Manto Tshabalala-Msimang.
_	Though longer birth spacing can help control population growth, the evidence that Chavez et al. present suggest a curtailing of reproductive choice and adaptability due to malnutrition.
_	At least one location the formation is intruded by a roughly coeval dacite dyke which adds to the evidence that the formation was coeval with the early stages of "Andean" volcanism.
_	In short, the presumption of innocence applies at the beginning and continues throughout the trial, unless you are satisfied after considering the whole of the evidence that the Crown has displaced the presumption of innocence by proof of guilt beyond a reasonable doubt."
_	His location was not established immediately; there is the evidence that in February he left in an unknown direction.
_	The Sri Lankan Government denied the evidence that was put forth to them from the video..
_	While this form of niacin does not cause the flushing associated with the immediate-release products, the evidence that it has lipid-modifying functions is disputed.
_	However, it is important to point out that the evidence that has been reviewed thus far comes primarily from self-report studies.
_	[“Field of the Sun”, the Latin name of Sonnefeld], (History of the Sonnefeld Monastery) has provided us the evidence that the monastery in the year 1264 was fully furnished and, with the nuns, staffed.
_	While the documentary presented the evidence that the bombing was an attempt on Bari's life, its failure to promote Bari's public narrative, that the timber industry or the FBI were behind the bombing, drew denunciation from Bari in an article titled "Who bought Steve Talbot?," disseminated through the "San Francisco Weekly" and the "Anderson Valley Advertiser."
_	The verdict ran: "The court regards it as proved by the evidence that both the "Narodna Odbrana" and military circles in the Kingdom of Serbia in charge of the espionage service, collaborated in the outrage."
_	No attempt was made to rebut #4, which was not known at the time, but which provides the strongest of the evidence that Leibniz came to the calculus independently from Newton.
_	A regular or conventional precognition is taken by a precognition officer who are employed by solicitors or insurance companies to evaluate the evidence that may be given by the witness whilst under oath.
_	Schmidt is sometimes cited as providing the evidence that Taylor viewed workers as solely motivated by money; one author has referred to Taylor's view of Schmidt as a 'greedy robot'.
_	The false potto is not listed separately from the potto in the Red List, because the evidence that it is a distinct species is considered insufficient.
_	It was held that the evidence that his father had coerced him into sexual acts with his other sisters as a child was similar fact evidence and, in addition to the systematic long-term sexual activity and abuse within the family, sufficient to explain why he felt that he could get away with abusing her and knew she could not rely on her family for protection; his appeal failed.
_	It appeared from the evidence that the accused, at the time when he committed the crime, was under the influence of liquor.
_	Green's attorneys claimed that new scientific techniques invalidated the evidence that the fire had been caused by arson.
_	Rae secretly shreds the evidence that connects Burtie to Lily and discourages Burtie from telling him anything incriminating.
_	This is the evidence that this person is suffering from the disease which is also known as "wu-ch'uan" 屋傳 [contagious disease contracted from a sick-room].
_	What is the evidence that can point to the destruction of a public building at a particular site?
_	In a detailed opinion describing the facts of the case and reciting the evidence that had been presented at trial, the court affirmed the conviction and sentence of death.
_	A sports bra, sweat shirt, leggings and tennis shoes were among the evidence that was recovered.
_	De Lima said the evidence that showed Webb and any of the co-accused were in the country came from the magnetic reel tape (MRT) of the Philippine Bureau of Immigration (BI) where all records of incoming and outgoing passengers from the Philippines are recorded.
_	Whether the report is biased or suffers from discrepancies or infirmities, or is unacceptable, for various reasons stated in objections have to be considered along with the rest of the evidence that has been brought on record, the Bench added and said that in its considered view this is not the proper stage to pronounce on these points.
_	Some of the evidence that was given at the court survives, but not the outcome.
_	He and Dick examine the body together, and Bruce makes Dick see the evidence that Ted was murdered, telling him to remember it.
_	The handwriting authorship fallacy is based on the evidence that many of Shelley's works such as "Prometheus Unbound", "The Masque of Anarchy", "The Witch of Atlas", "Peter Bell the Third", "The Sensitive Plant", and the play "The Cenci" were all in Mary's handwriting but composed by Shelley.
_	She watches the video of the previous night's speech by Kabir, but as they are unable to find the evidence that Kabir claimed to have, they let the guests go.
_	This kind of evaluation ignores historical background and the evidence that was available at a particular time: did Aristarchus have evidence to support his idea that the Sun was at the center?
_	The Waitangi Tribunal, in its 1996 report, Kaupapa Tuatahi, observed: "We are unaware of the evidence that the hapū agreed to this arrangement.
_	Archaeometallurgy works as a good field for experimental reproduction because of the evidence that is provided from excavation is a good starting point for reconstruction.
_	It reviewed the evidence that the initial global warming changes would lead to feedbacks and accelerated warming.
_	The Committee were particularly critical of the failure of the Home Office to publish the evidence that lies behind the Home Office-commissioned Scott Baker review – the only parliamentary review to conclude that the US/UK Treaty was not imbalanced.
_	The photographed view of a not completely closed door, raddled office furniture or a crooked hung portrait of Erich Honecker on the wall, is an artistic visualization of the evidence that the regime was an ailing system long before the fall of the Wall.
_	Coumarin is subject to restrictions on its use in perfumery, as some people may become sensitized to it, however the evidence that coumarin can cause an allergic reaction in humans is disputed.
_	However, the data that supported the more traditional placement of Ornithischia, as sister-taxon of Saurischia, was found not to be statistically significant from the evidence that supported the Ornithoscelida hypothesis, in both the study by Langer et al. and the reply to the study by Baron et al.
_	Worth noting about the interior of the various buildings of the total complex is the evidence that its architecture was influenced by Norman Sicilian qualities.
_	This status paradox does not correlate with the evidence that shows such rates should be increasing, not decreasing.
_	Commander André Bouchard who headed the investigation that assembled the evidence that Boucher had ordered the murders of Lavinge and Rondeau, had been feeling heartbroken when he learned that Boucher had been acquitted of the two murders, and felt that attending the Hilton-Ouellet boxing match might get his mind off the pain of defeat.
_	However this case had an unusual feature, namely that the evidence that the prosecution would seek to use at a retrial had not been available at the original trial, through no fault of the prosecution, since although the interviews had been taken at that time they had not been published.
_	He based his conclusions on the evidence that transitional tetrapod fossils are consistently found in habitats that were formerly humid and wooded floodplains.
_	As a result, it was stated by the SPD representative in the committee that it was confirmed by the evidence that "the deployment of the security forces went wrong with graving consequences for the women affected".
_	"New York Times" columnist Ross Douthat, while "broadly convinced by the argument that our current era of relative peace reflects a longer term trend away from violence, and broadly impressed by the evidence that Pinker marshals to support this view," offered a list of criticisms and concludes Pinker assumes almost all the progress starts with "the Enlightenment, and all that came before was a long medieval dark."
_	The five monasteries formed a network; "all of them were under state supervision" and there existed "a system of co-ordination among them . . it seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pala were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	Evidence suggests that these Iraqi chemical casualties were likely the result of "blowback," whereas the evidence that Iraq submitted to the UN—such as two Iranian 130 mm shells that UN specialists found had "no internal chemical–resistant coating" and were "normally used for filling with high explosives"—did not withstand scrutiny; UN official Iqbal Riza later acknowledged that Iraq's evidence was "clearly fabricated."
_	Yet the evidence that the FSB was at least involved in planting a bomb in Ryazan is incontrovertible."
_	The result is that, if for any reason a defendant who is charged with a felonious homicide can prove that at the time the killing occurred he was in such a state of terror or rage, or was otherwise incapable of premeditation or forming a design to effect the death of some human being, or if the evidence for the state indicates the same state of mind, he cannot be guilty of murder under the statutes above quoted, unless it be proven by the evidence that his mental condition at the time grew out of his own intentional wrongful and illegal conduct, of such a character as to show that the act of killing was the result of premeditation and formed design.
_	The overwhelming majority were in the Lowlands, where the Kirk had more control, despite the evidence that basic magical beliefs were very widespread in the Highlands.
_	The burden of proof () is the obligation of a party in a trial to produce the evidence that will prove the claims they have made against the other party.
_	Seetharam destroys the will by burning, thus eradicating the evidence that Abhi is Vindha's son.
_	Huekler, an alternate juror who stepped forward the day of the verdict, said, "The prosecution didn't provide the evidence that was there for any of the charges from first-degree murder down to second-degree murder to the child abuse to even the manslaughter [charge].
_	Lee said that "according to all the evidence that has been reported, I believe that Mr. Lee had been taken against his will by certain law enforcement agents from across the border through illegal means".
_	According to the media the police does not have the evidence that Šukalo was involved in match fixing, however, they do have the evidence that he was collecting and investing money in the organization because of which he could face between one and eight years in prison.
_	Rice says that "the evidence that the most refined astronomical observation was practised in Egypt in the third millennium BC (and probably even before that date) is clear from the precision with which the Pyramids at Giza are aligned to the cardinal points, a precision which could only have been achieved by their alignment with the stars. " (p. 31) The Egyptians also, says Rice, were "to alter the orientation of a temple when the star on whose position it had originally been set moved its position as a consequence of the Precession, something which seems to have happened several times during the New Kingdom." (p. 170)
_	These basic Hindu templates provide the evidence that Nepal was administered as a Hindu state.
_	This was the evidence that Brace had discovered a new hummingbird species which lived on New Providence since the Pleistocene.
_	Despite the evidence that exonerated all defendants, in the trial that was held against them, individuals were not being judged, but an entire collective.
_	Yet to the intelligent design movement's conservative Christian constituents Dembski has said "intelligent design should be understood as the evidence that God has placed in nature to show that the physical world is the product of intelligence and not simply the result of mindless material forces.
_	Particularly in the case of oxygen-ion conducting electrolyte systems, for instance, the migrated anionic O species from the solid electrolyte to the metal-gas interface has been suggested as the origin of the corresponding EPOC effects along with the evidence that the migrated charged species on the surface can be identified via in-situ spectroscopic methods.
_	The five monasteries formed a network; "all of them were under state supervision" and their existed "a system of co-ordination among them . . it seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pāla were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	Even with the evidence that they had, the Secretary of State George Shultz did not feel that there was enough to indict Pinochet but instead used the information to try to convince Reagan to change their policy with Chile.
_	Thomas initially lacked the first-hand experience of the evidence that had convinced them...
_	It completely ignores all the evidence that contradicts its claims."
_	The prosecution produced the various accounts and depositions written by the defendants and the evidence that the "Mignonette" was registered in Britain, necessary to establish the court's jurisdiction under s.267 of the Merchant Shipping Act 1854.
_	There is a quadrangular statue located in the triangle on both sides of the verandah in the south of Gokh in the Gokh of the temple and the Chakrabhuj statue raised in the horoscope, and the historical document is determined by the evidence that this temple is Lord Vishnu.
_	They may be linked to Kapalikas or Kalamukhas given they share their unorthodox lifestyle, though neither the doctrines nor the evidence that links them has been uncovered.
_	She believes that this is the evidence that will prove their wealth; however, Stella then sees through the documents how her father's plan failed because of an economic collapse and the failures of his unscrupulous business partners.
_	During the course of their appeal, the production of these documents leads to a triumphant scene in court when Peirce produces the evidence that the police have been lying throughout about the existence of a witness who had provided Conlon with an alibi during their initial investigation.
_	Arguments adduced include the lack of an explicit dedication to Raymond, the evidence that substantial portions of book 1 were complete by mid-1259 (suggesting that Thomas started work on the book as early as 1257), and the suggestion that the work makes no effort to address tenets of Islam specifically.
_	"The master concluded on all the evidence that the allegations in New Mexico's bill as to the location and course of the Rio Grande 'as it existed in the year 1850' were not sustained, and that the river did not then flow on the eastern side of the valley as claimed by New Mexico; that its location and course in 1850 was, in general, as alleged in the cross- bill of Texas."
_	Finally, forcing the government to prove at trial that the defendant had previously been convicted of a crime risks making trials inherently unfair insofar as the jury, faced with such evidence, would be more inclined to convict the defendant on the basis of those prior convictions alone rather than the evidence that he is guilty of the presently charged crime.
_	would likely have little sympathy with Searle’s ongoing refusal to confront the evidence that the Degas he had purchased in good faith had been stolen by the Nazis."
_	Before long, Sexton appears, where Holmes confronts him with the evidence that he has found and observed throughout the investigation.
_	The novel is often cited as a possible influence on Stephen Crane's "The Red Badge of Courage", though the evidence that Crane had read the novel remains inconclusive.
_	If, after hearing, the magistrate is satisfied from the evidence that the person is a fugitive he may issue an order authorizing affiant to return the fugitive to the jurisdiction from which he escaped bail.
_	It's a combination of feeling responsible to the evidence that is available, feeling responsible to go out and find that evidence, including the evidence that is contrary to one's presumptions, and responsibility to be logical with one's self and others.
_	However, those who believe that Sappho did compose the poem argue that the evidence that the poem was not in Aeolic is "at best ambiguous", and find the other arguments put forward against Sappho's authorship unconvincing.
_	It also refers to the rancorous language and personal smears that Ancel Keys — the American epidemiologist who had proposed that saturated fat was the primary cause of heart disease — employed to dismiss the evidence that sugar was the true culprit.
_	On appeal, the evidence that the water's fuel content was in fact far lower than originally suggested was ignored, and the charges amended to:
_	It also refers to the rancorous language and personal smears used by Ancel Keys to dismiss the evidence that sugar was the true culprit.
_	The right of appeal is generally limited to a review of the record of the proceedings before the administrative law judge; that is, if a party appeals the final decision of an administrative law judge to a Maryland circuit court, the court will decide the case based on the evidence that was brought before the administrative law judge, or may order the administrative law judge to conduct further proceedings, but will not conduct a new trial.
_	Accompanied by his attorney Lawyer Sharky, Azure Blue, a man who claims to be Olaf's distant descendant, sets out to find the evidence that his ancestor left behind as proof of his claim — a Golden Helmet, whose possessor will be the owner of North America.
_	During the appeal hearing, a Home Office pathologist, Dr Ian West, admitted that some of the evidence that he had used at Wallace's trial had been supplied to him by "an American security source".
_	During this time, Kimberlin proclaimed his innocence with regard to the Speedway bombings and blamed his late younger brother, Scott, for the presence of the evidence that linked him to them.
_	Medical studies among the Tharu and non-Tharu population of the Terai yielded the evidence that the prevalence of cases of residual malaria is nearly seven times lower among Tharus.
_	When C.C.'s daughter Kelly was accused of murdering Dylan Hartley, Gina got her hands on the evidence that could set Kelly free, so she decided to use it as a way to blackmail C.C. into marrying her.
_	The district court found that it was "quite clear from the evidence that the essential reason for the transfer was that Acanfora is an admitted homosexual," and that "the Board of Education would not knowingly hire a homosexual".
_	Fourthly, according to Mahmood Ahmad, the Quran contained prophecies and those prophecies which had been fulfilled up until the time of this commentary, constituted an important part of the evidence that the Quran was the revealed word of God.
_	Validity describes the evidence that an assessment tool measures what it was supposed to measure.
_	Cepheids were soon detected in other galaxies, such as Andromeda (notably by Edwin Hubble in 1923–24), and they became an important part of the evidence that "spiral nebulae" are independent galaxies located far outside of our own Milky Way.
_	This is confirmed by the evidence that bilinguals are less able to recall words, or initiate representations of words that are different in each language.
_	The Council members at Hammersmith and Fulham were unsure how to react; they wanted to take credit for striking a blow against financial capitalism, but this was at odds with the evidence that they had been oblivious to what their finance department had been doing.
_	Even Queen Victoria was said to be troubled by the prospect of Lipski being executed solely on the evidence that had been presented to the court.
_	(Morley uses Boccaccio's version of the story of a brooch, or in this case a pin, attached to a piece of Diomedes' armour as the evidence that convinces the Trojan.)
_	A systematic review of herbal medicines used for the treatment of rhinosinusitis concluded that the evidence that any herbal medicines are beneficial in the treatment of rhinosinusitis is limited, and that for "Myrtus" there is insufficient data to verify the significance of clinical results.
_	Investigative files in the Secret Service's largest field office were lost, with one Secret Service agent saying, "All the evidence that we stored at 7 World Trade, in all our cases, went down with the building."
_	Because, with hindsight, the evidence that Cynthia's life had been ebbing with her husband's was all too apparent.
_	The list was based on secret information, and the organizations listed were not given opportunities to see the evidence that led to their listing, nor were they able to refute the allegations.
_	After showing Logan the evidence that Mercer is innocent, he tells Veronica what he was doing: they were in Tijuana, and Mercer set a room on fire.
_	He argues that, based on the evidence that the former Serbian leader was completely innocent of the charges brought against him.
_	Rudge points to the evidence that he talked Boskamp out of quitting during the pre-season.
_	Fouché showed Bonaparte the evidence that the bomb made by the exclusif Chevalier, whom Dubois’ police had accused of having made the machine infernale, was quite different from the bomb that had exploded in the rue Saint-Nicaise.
_	After talking with numerous witnesses and considering much evidence, the committee judged the evidence that Iraq was trying to procure uranium was not sufficiently strong enough to justify absolute terms.
_	One important aspect of the site therefore is the evidence that it yields for chronological relationships between North and South Mesopotamian cultures, at least in the area of Mandali, and for connections with Iran.
_	Tron's victory in the mainframe has released all lockouts on computer access, and a nearby printer produces the evidence that Dillinger had plagiarized Flynn's creations.
_	Goda charged that Erika Raeder and her friends had grossly quoted out of context certain passages from Churchill's 1948 book "The Gathering Storm" to support their claim that the invasion of Norway was a "preventive war" forced on the Third Reich while ignoring the evidence that had convicted Raeder at Nuremberg.
_	"We will not understand the nature of those societies better if, whether out of embarrassment, disbelief, or lack of interest, we choose to ignore either the ease with which they were often brought under colonial control, or the evidence that 'Stranger-Kings' were perceived as fulfilling useful functions among them."
_	Some athletes were concerned that they might unwittingly ingest a banned substance if the host tampered with food or drinks, while others "were worried about the evidence that Russian laboratories had been opening tamper-proof bottles.
_	James wrote "I would characterize the evidence that Rose bet on baseball as...well, not quite non-existent.
_	Downs said that the appeal judges had ignored the evidence that she had provided — and that the landmark High Court victory had been based on.
_	Hale has helped present fresh evidence to the Independent Police Complaints Commission (IPCC) on behalf and in support of the family's claim that the police inquiry was flawed, and that much of the evidence that could have helped his defence, was not presented at trial.
_	As of 2017, only about two-thirds of the world population have access to traps, in spite of the evidence that good sewage systems significantly improve economic productivity in countries that employ them.
_	"Hernando De Soto's expedition staggered through the Southeast for four years in the early 16th century and saw hordes of people but apparently did not see a single bison," Charles C. Mann wrote in "", pages 367 ff, Mann discussed the evidence that Native Americans not only created (by selective use of fire) the large grasslands that provided the bison's ideal habitat but also kept the bison population regulated.
_	He does a terrible job trying to defend himself as the evidence that were presented to him clearly proved that he ate someone.
_	Although the evidence that cognitive deficits remain stable over time is reliable and abundant, much of the research in this domain focuses on methods to improve attention and working memory.
_	"A persistent effort to examine any belief or supposed form of knowledge in the light of the evidence that supports or refutes it and the further conclusions to which it tends."
_	Uma's father is later revealed to be the man responsible for falsifying the evidence that led to Murugan's imprisonment.
_	Haydn's purchase order is part of the evidence that the symphony was completed in the autumn of 1772.
_	Helen Cooke settled the case against Stanley Levy when she was shown all the evidence that had been collected against her.
_	The majority of scholars, however, dismiss these arguments with the evidence that the text finishes at the bottom of a page, and that there is a simple point, which translators assume indicates the end of a complete sentence.
_	These hypotheses have been rejected by scientific consensus; it is generally accepted among pathologists that "…the evidence that HIV causes AIDS is scientifically conclusive", and most "scientific" arguments for denialism are based on misrepresentations of outdated data.
_	The programme examined the evidence that senior officers with South Yorkshire Police (SYP) had conspired to co-ordinate statements to wrongly charge arrested miners with riot, an offence which at the time carried a punishment of life imprisonment.
_	Villiers was unsuccessful in his attempts, but in 1840 sat on the Committee on Import Duties that provided much of the evidence that pressured Robert Peel into his sliding scale concession in 1842.
_	Two weeks before an election all voters receive a card, which is the evidence that they are entitled to vote, and this card must be handed over at the polling-station before voting.
_	Critics in the Fair trade debate claim that some volunteers can have an incorrect view of Fairtrade, because the information is concealed from them, in particular that the evidence that little or none of the extra amount paid by consumers always reaches the producers, and an alleged lack of evidence that Fairtrade has a positive impact on Third World producers.
_	However, these claims have not been submitted for peer review, and the evidence that has been made available to other scientists is weak.
_	It could also reveal that Giric received or was reliant upon significant assistance from Eochaid—in this case his maternal kinsman—which would in turn account for the evidence that Giric and Eochaid shared the Pictish kingship in some manner.
_	However, many members of the Community of Christ, and some of the groups that were formerly associated with it are not convinced that Joseph Smith practiced plural marriage, and feel that the evidence that he did is flawed.
_	Everybody was surprised when the former intelligence chief "Amin Howeidi" said he knew about how Dr.Hemdan died, and he assured that he had the evidence that confirmed that Dr.Hemdan was killed by the Mossad 'Israeli intelligence'.
_	Looking at the role of Óðinn as sorcerer under the lens of queer theory, Price then discusses the evidence that "Seiðr" practices offered involved sexual acts such as masturbation.
_	Abandoned by their government and left for dead, the weary soldiers race to uncover the evidence that will prove their innocence while ensuring that the violence is contained.
_	Bugliosi argues that Bush intentionally misled Congress and the American people about the evidence that he said mandated going into Iraq and overthrowing Saddam Hussein.
_	Bossert said that Canada, New Zealand and Japan agree with the United States' assessment of the evidence that links the attack to North Korea, while the United Kingdom's Foreign and Commonwealth Office says it also stands behind the United States' assertion.
_	They kill him and recover the evidence that the FBI have about them.
_	The President of Colombia Mariano Ospina Pérez and the Colombian General Secretary Rafael Azula Barrera considered the evidence that the revolver Roa had carried was incapable of accurate fire, that Roa was not thought to have any firearms training, and that no eyewitness saw Roa anywhere near the assassination, that he was first seen between two policemen.
_	For example, some have claimed that switching from a QWERTY computer keyboard layout to a more optimised ergonomic layout such as Dvorak was commonly cited as beneficial in early CTS studies; however, some meta-analyses of these studies claim that the evidence that they present is limited.
_	Critical to an assessment of the validity of the theory, therefore, is an understanding of the reliability and significance of the evidence that led to the belief that ice ever reached the tropics.
_	This study found that the evidence that childhood trauma confers a risk of adult psychosis is highly consistent, with children who have experienced trauma (sexual abuse, physical abuse, loss of a parent or bullying) being approximately three times more likely to become psychotic than non-traumatised children; there was a dose-response effect (the most severely traumatised children were even more likely to become psychotic) suggesting that the effect is causal.
_	the evidence that prompted President Clinton to order the missile strike on the Shifa plant was not as solid as first portrayed.
_	Most of the evidence that was uncovered was circumstantial, for example, his mail order for a large quantity of photographic equipment, and his friendship with the Indonesian exiles.
_	The magistrate could not find on the evidence that the accused had the necessary criminal responsibility, and gave him the benefit of the doubt that his version could possibly be true.
_	Ultimately, the Court found that based on the evidence that was not brought to light, a reasonable juror could have found Kyles not guilty.
_	The 102-page decision said "It is clear on the evidence that their intention was to conduct a vendetta in which the truth about Mr. Nazerali himself was of no consequence.
_	"We conclude from the evidence that entrapment was established as a matter of law ...
_	Her requests to become a writer were denied, despite the evidence that she preferred writing to needlework.
_	Green supports this hypothesis with the evidence that Shakespeare never wrote dedications in of his works to any person besides Wriothesley.
_	The court held on the evidence that Holmdene's bricks did indeed contain a latent defect, and that the demolition of the walls was a natural and foreseeable consequence of this breach.
_	"Soap Opera Digest" praised Phyllis finding the evidence that freed Sharon from prison in 2011, writing:
_	In July 2008, a special commission of the Legislative Assembly of Rio Grande do Sul, Goulart's home state, concluded that "the evidence that Jango was willfully assassinated, with knowledge of the Geisel government, is strong."
_	Gene and Morty suspect XXXX of foul play; after being shown the evidence that Jimmy is a grass, the pair acknowledge XXXX as the new acting boss and show him the corpse of the Duke.
_	Despite the evidence that the Chinese had been decisively defeated and were streaming back in disarray towards the Chinese frontier, he convinced himself that they were preparing to encircle Lạng Sơn and cut his supply line.
_	Known as the 2nd Sealand Dynasty, the evidence that this was a Kassite Dynasty is rather tenuous.
_	Another point of controversy stems from the evidence that after his wife Martha died in 1782, Jefferson fathered children with Martha's half-sister, Sally Hemings, who was his slave.
_	The rationale was that solicitors could investigate and gather evidence and instructions and filter them – according to the interests of the client – before presenting them to the barrister; in return the barrister, being one step removed from the client, could reach a more objective opinion of the merits of the case, working strictly from the evidence that would be admissible in court.
_	Although the evidence that stopping exposure to beryllium decreases progression of the disease, it is still considered to be an accepted approach to treatment in any stage of disease.
_	Skrabanek also relies on his criticism of the evidence that most of the preventive and screening actions are less effective, scientifically unsubstantiated, and are often only a manifestation of the desire of bureaucracy for power and the efforts of pharmaceutical companies to increase profits.
_	In addition to this, TFIIB levels have been shown to fluctuate in different types of cell, and at different points in the cell cycle, supporting the evidence that it is not required for all RNA polymerase II transcription.
_	While Red Army generals correctly judged the evidence that Hitler would shift his efforts south, Stalin thought it a flanking move in the German attempt to take Moscow.
_	Most of the evidence that supports the many theories about obsidian use in Mesoamerica comes from the artwork of the region.
_	Where the defendant is a member of the United States Congress, the Speech or Debate Clause of Article One of the United States Constitution—providing that: "[F]or any Speech or Debate in either House, [Senators or Representatives] shall not be questioned in any other Place"—limits the acts which may be charged and the evidence that may be introduced.
_	Saunders responded that police were not being "coy" about community safety, but that he had been speaking of the evidence that they had at that time.
_	In 1994, Afflerbach questioned the authenticity of this "Christmas Memorandum" in his biography of Falkenhayn; after studying the evidence that had survived in the (Army Military History Research Institute) files, he concluded that the memorandum had been written after the war but that it was an accurate reflection of much of Falkenhayn's thinking in 1916.
_	Chief among the evidence that convinces Monroe to continue to dig is Fisher's elementary school class photo that has been marked, indicating three of the children dead.
_	At sentencing, the judge found by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant (1) distributed 566 grams over and above the 100 grams that the jury had to have found and (2) had obstructed justice.
_	Further evidence to support this mechanism of regulation includes the evidence that surivin is poly-ubiquinated and degraded by proteasomes during interphase of the cell cycle.
_	Tucker expressed some sympathy for Carrier's view of the Gospels, stating: "The problem with the Synoptic Gospels as evidence for a historical Jesus from a Bayesian perspective is that the evidence that coheres does not seem to be independent, whereas the evidence that is independent does not seem to cohere."
_	During this trial, Fenerbahçe lawyers urged the court not to rule according to the evidence that had been presented by a chief constable who has now been expelled from his job.
_	Priestley and other Dissenters blamed the government for the riots, believing that William Pitt and his supporters had instigated them; however, it seems from the evidence that the riots were actually organised by local Birmingham officials.
_	After the flares had been lit the confusion persisted, because the tanks units refused to accept the evidence that their map reading was even worse than that of the infantry.
_	The book was published just after Darwin published the Origin of the Species and after the evidence that mammoths and humans lived at the same time.
_	There is, however, some debate over the evidence that any large number of Pueblo people lived with the Navajos in this period.
_	Ospina Pérez and Azula Barrera considered the evidence that the revolver Roa had carried was incapable of accurate fire, that Roa was not thought to have any firearms training, the assassination had been committed at some distance, and that no eyewitness saw Roa anywhere near the assassination, that he was first seen between two policemen.
_	This issue of 'Big Picture' looks at the theory of evolution, the evidence that supports it, unanswered questions and the history of public reaction.
_	However, many members of the Community of Christ, and some of the groups that were formerly associated with it are still not convinced that Joseph Smith III's father did indeed engage in plural marriage, and feel that the evidence that he did so is largely flawed.
_	The resolution of a deferred disposition is controlled by 17-A M.R.S.A. § 1348-B, which requires that the Court hold a sentencing hearing wherein the defendant has the burden by showing as a preponderance of the evidence that they have complied with the terms of the deferred disposition agreement.
_	If the defendant cannot show by a preponderance of the evidence that they have complied with the deferred disposition agreement, then the Court will proceed to sentence the defendant on the original charge as per the terms of the agreement.
_	The Court will set a hearing on the prosecutor’s motion, who must show by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant failed to comply.
_	In effect, the act of the couple representing themselves to others as being married, and organizing their relation as if they were married, acts as the evidence that they are married.
_	In his 1998 autobiography, Mullis expressed disagreement with the scientific evidence supporting climate change and ozone depletion, the evidence that HIV causes AIDS, and asserted his belief in astrology.
_	The board also wrote: "In assessing the evidence that was presented in favour of designation, this Board is aware that there are many gaps that cast some doubt on the historical testimony".
_	Objections to the evidence that evolution occurs tend to be more concrete and specific, often involving direct analysis of evolutionary biology's methods and claims.
_	Many modern scientists have even discounted the evidence that supports HHSP as speculation.
_	Attorney Jon Eisenberg, who submitted an amicus curiae brief in support of Rose and Robert Wendland, believed that the Court plainly intended its opinion to apply narrowly to the question before it, so that in such circumstances, physicians may withdraw life-sustaining treatment at the direction of family or friends who can show by preponderance of the evidence that this would coincide with the patient's wishes.
_	Because it places strict limits on the evidence that may be adduced in aid of interpretation, the rule forms a background to "all" interpretation.
_	This has been a part of the evidence that sets a floruit of 5th-century to the importance of Ganesha in Hindu theology.
_	the evidence that a statistically significant correlation is present confirms the genetic hypothesis".
_	Despite the evidence that they were not related, Renee refused to leave David.
_	He based this assessment on his review of the evidence that the intelligence of adopted children related more to the social class of their biological parents than to that of their adopting parents.
_	Elizabeth divorced George in 1911, using the evidence that he was living at Gainsborough Studios in London with Lillian.
_	The trial judge concluded from the whole of the evidence that Weinberg and Charest deliberately, wilfully, and knowingly infringed Robinson’s copyright, and this was supported by the evidence.
_	Practice in a classroom is formative to the extent that evidence about student achievement is elicited, interpreted, and used by teachers, learners, or their peers, to make decisions about the next steps in instruction that are likely to be better, or better founded, than the decisions they would have taken in the absence of the evidence that was elicited.
_	In December, she was sentenced to a two-year supervision and treatment order, the judge commenting that although some might feel she had "got away with it", the court had acted "in accordance with the law of the land and on the basis of the evidence that it hears".
_	Toobin wrote that in the presentation of the grand jury decision, McCulloch cherry-picked the evidence that was most exculpatory of Wilson, and asserted that McCulloch "gave Wilson's case special treatment".
_	The five monasteries formed a network; "all of them were under state supervision" and their existed "a system of co-ordination among them ... it seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pāla were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	Innate truths are imprinted on our minds, and the evidence that they are so imprinted is that they are universally accepted.
_	However, before the arbitration process can be resolved, Worf's (Michael Dorn) one-time mate, K'Ehleyr (Suzie Plakson), discovers the evidence that implicates Ja'rod (the father of Duras) in the Romulan attack on the Klingon outpost Khitomer, and to prevent her from disclosing it, Duras murders her.
_	In Virginia, a plaintiff must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the covenant is reasonable in the sense that it is: (1) no greater than necessary to protect its legitimate business interests, such as a trade secret; (2) not unduly harsh or oppressive in restricting the employee's ability to earn a living; and (3) not against public policy.
_	Briggs was appointed by the court to defend him; convinced by the evidence that the man was innocent, Briggs made what was described by a contemporary as a plea that was "a model of jury eloquence".
_	The charges were dropped, although this was around a year after the original events, despite the strength of the evidence that they were innocent.
_	While they recognize that conclusive evidence has not been found, the evidence that has been found there fits with what is known of the history of that time and they postulate that if "Le Griffon" is found elsewhere, that would deepen the mystery of the find by Cullis.
_	Since Willingham's 2004 execution, significant controversy has arisen over the interpretation of the evidence that was used to convict him of arson and murder.
_	Similarly, when treating social anxiety disorder, CBT produced an effect size of 0.62, which again supports the evidence that CBT does in fact yield significantly better results than other therapies.
_	Many times, the evidence that is collected from the physical examinations and testimony of those who were raped is in the possession of numerous law enforcement agencies and may impede the recognition that the rapist has committed the crime over a period of time.
_	Kersh explains to Doggett that he left the evidence that helped Doggett, and that he had told Mulder to flee, but ultimately it was Scully who actually convinced Mulder to do so.
_	Among the evidence that was given by Mrs Dunn and also recorded in correspondence between the Home and the India Office was of an ayah who was brought to England from Bombay by a British woman in 1908, who, in the usual manner, released her to Thomas Cook and Son in order to transfer her employment.
_	On the permanent dayside of the tidally locked planet where the surface temperature is hot from continuously facing its sun, the surface takes part in convection, which is the evidence that all the surface of this hemisphere being covered in oceans of lava.
_	In addition he argued that "Odontogriphus"’ shedding and replacement of tooth-rows, the rows' staying in the same relative positions when isolated and the evidence that "Odontogriphus" sometimes swallowed discarded tooth-rows did not prove that "Odontogriphus" was an evolutionary "aunt" of molluscs, since eunicid polychaetes also molt and replace their feeding apparatus (which sometimes resembles a radula), and sometimes eat the discarded material.
_	He notes that the Tutsi-led Rwandese Patriotic Front conducted a war of aggression from Uganda against Rwanda with US and British support from 1990, and presents the evidence that the RPF was responsible for the 1994 shoot down of the presidential plane which killed the Hutu presidents of Burundi and Rwanda.
_	Identification of the French fort location was made possible by the restricted location of distinctively French artifacts, and by the evidence that multiple moats had been dug around the site of the first Fort San Marcos.
_	A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
_	The finding of fact that the directors "had an honest belief in the statement" runs contrary to the evidence that although they expected to get planning permission as a mere formality, they plainly knew that they did not yet have that permission.
_	In it were the evidence that Russia needed to persuade Italy to support her Serbian policy in the Balkans.
_	It reviews the evidence that elementary cognitive tasks (ECTs) are correlated with "g".
_	The badly burnt body in the car which fell from the cliff belongs to a man and not a woman, and all the evidence that exists at the crime scene are all fake, which are used for cinema.
_	Khalid El-Rouayheb notes similarly that Ibn Taymiyyah had "very little influence on mainstream Sunni Islam until the nineteenth century." and that he was "a little-read scholar with problematic and controversial views" and that "The idea that Ibn Taymiyyah had an immediate and significant impact on the course of Sunni Islamic religious history simply does not cohere with the evidence that we have from the five centuries that elapsed between his death and the rise of Sunni revivialism in the modern period."
_	The BIA denied Boika’s motion to reopen on finding that the evidence that she presented did not represent a “material change of conditions” in Belarus and that the evidence did not show a prima facie claim for eligibility for asylum.
_	A significant advantage of home testing is the evidence that patient self-testing with medical support and patient self-management (where patients adjust their own anticoagulant dose) improves anticoagulant control.
_	Radley Balko noted that "...[t]here's something pretty unsavory about a judicial philosophy that cites a ruling that we now know sent an innocent man back to prison as an authority to deny compensation to another innocent man who was nearly executed because the government hid the evidence that would have and eventually did exonerate him."
_	Pro-life activists dispute the evidence that greater access to contraceptives reduces abortion frequency.
_	With the evidence that he was presented with, Rivers was led to the conclusion that something had happened to him on the upper floor of that house, the memory of which was entirely suppressed because it "interfered with [his] comfort and happiness".
_	In Utah, an August 2009 poll carried out for the "Deseret News" and KSL-TV found that 67% of Utahns accepted the evidence that Obama was born in the U.S.
_	Validity describes the evidence that an assessment tool measures what it was supposed to measure.
_	Annexin A1 protects against DNA damage induced by heat in breast cancer cells, adding to the evidence that it has tumor suppressive and protective activities.
_	There is little high quality research on the effectiveness of family therapy for ADHD, but the evidence that exists shows that it is similar to community care and better than a placebo.
_	Congruent with the evidence that shows Hitler was responsible for the order to kill Jews, there is also evidence that shows he was made aware of the process.
_	Recent molecular and morphological data provide the evidence that the mainland, Javan, and Bornean Sunda flying lemur subspecies may be recognised as three separate species in the genus "Galeopterus".
_	These materials "were sufficient to show by a preponderance of the evidence that Kramer's phone was an 'electronic... or other high speed data processing device' that 'perform[ed] logical, arithmetic, or storage functions' when Kramer used it to call and text message the victim."
_	Moreover, the evidence that the onus of defending the town fell on his shoulders supports this.
_	It appeared from the evidence that, in pursuing the would-be robbers, Siljeur had used his firearm in a manner which was contrary both to the standing orders of the SAPS and to the provisions of the Criminal Procedure Act.
_	The film is a work of historical fiction, inspired by a painting and the evidence that Dido was brought up at Kenwood House.
_	Though many writers explored space travel before these events and inventions, the reality of new technologies and the evidence that space exploration was now possible opened new doors to create more fantastical ideas of space travel.
_	The court of appeals further held that the burden rested upon the employees to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that they did not receive the wages to which they were entitled.
_	Arriving at the place of crime, Kimble immediately begins to suspect that Mark tries to cover Paula, especially after he finds the evidence that Mark planted in advance.
_	However, obstinate Karan is still seeking his revenge by stalking Ravi in the hospital and hatches a plan to kill Ravi. Karan and Kajri collect all the evidence that proves Karan's father's innocence.
_	At paragraph [40] it was stated "Qualified belief or disbelief does not rule out inducement, particularly where those investigations were never going to find out the evidence that subsequently came to light."
_	Tucker expressed some sympathy for Carrier's view of the Gospels, stating: "The problem with the Synoptic Gospels as evidence for a historical Jesus from a Bayesian perspective is that the evidence that coheres does not seem to be independent, whereas the evidence that is independent does not seem to cohere".
_	Cicero is frustrated that, despite all of the evidence that has been compiled against Catiline, who has been conspiring to overthrow the Roman government and assassinate Cicero himself, and in spite of the fact that the senate has given senatus consultum ultimum, Catiline has not yet been executed.
_	Qureshi was strongly against the dropping of bombs in Syria, as after travelling on a fact-finding mission with the Foreign Affairs Committee she argued that while the bombs would certainly cause "many innocent civilian deaths", the evidence that the strikes would significantly weaken ISIS was unclear.
_	The individual denied the allegations and sought legal counsel to generate the evidence that the allegations were false and then convince the UN to retract the allegations made in the report, as these allegations had taken a severe toll on his business interests throughout the DRC and elsewhere in Africa and Europe.
_	Despite these works and incorporation of Dramatism in feminist work, there remains the evidence that Burke did not use or intent his theory to account for gender.
_	This destroys the evidence that she was an android and makes it appear that Superman killed her.
_	Based on the evidence that is presented in the book the authors conclude that
_	There was a book published by Gareth Porter in the U.S. some time ago about the whole Iranian affair, and, well, he certainly maintains that much of the evidence that was given to the IAEA was really cooked, was not authentic.
_	Pawlikowski characterized Cornwall's book as "full of exaggerated claims and deceptions," "a work of deeply flawed scholarship" that "presents only the evidence that suggests [Cornwall's] predetermined view."
_	The outcome of the speech is unknown, though modern commentators have criticised the evidence that Apollodoros put forward as failing to prove his case.
_	He sits in a room as a prisoner for the rest of the day, until Jack provides CTU with the evidence that the Cyprus Recording is a forgery, and the attacks are called off by Prescott.
_	Its intention was to summarise the evidence that the consumption of sugar was leading to a greatly increased incidence of coronary thrombosis; that it was certainly involved in dental caries, probably involved in obesity, diabetes and liver disease, and possibly involved in gout, dyspepsia and some cancers.
_	The specific name "anthropophagus" is from Greek word ""anthropos"" that means "human" and Greek word ""phagos"" that means "eater", in reference to the evidence that this animal included hominids in its diet.
_	Marshal Bridge is compelled to play along after Victor bluffs that he 'knows' that there is something in the evidence that Kevin collected that would be potentially damaging to the Marshal Service.
_	In the end, Hauser had to face the evidence that his zero-sum-game theory was inadequate to explain Proust’s resourceful usage of time and money.
_	Scott Shane of "The New York Times" said "perhaps if we had had more information on these secret internal deliberations of governments prior to the invasion of Iraq in 2003, we would have had a better understanding of the quality of the evidence that Saddam Hussein had weapons of mass destruction.
_	Rick returns to High Bluff and apologizes to his children for having been blinded to the evidence that Sharon was not a real human by his need for adult companionship.
_	Furthermore, some studies show the robustness of implicit learning through the evidence that other factors that are unique to each individual (i.e. intelligence quotient) as well as multitasking is less likely to affect implicit learning than explicit learning.
_	Harrison does not address the evidence that Blavatsky was simply another fraudulent medium using "spirit rapping" such as that uncovered by the Seybert Commission in 1887.
_	Israeli Police who investigated the case eventually concluded that the evidence that was collected was insufficient for indictment, and no recommendations were made to press charges.
_	While the partial Michigan recount did unearth some instances of improper ballot handling and possible voter fraud, no indications of widespread hacking were discovered, and the overall outcome of the election remained unchanged, despite the evidence that the voting machines were old and faulty, possibly counting as "blank" ballots many that contained visually clear indications of presidential choice.<ref>
_	The museum also contains a replica of the Tugu Inscription (the original being in the National Museum) from the age of Great King Purnawarman, which is the evidence that the center of the Kingdom of Tarumanegara was located around the seaport of Tanjung Priok on the coast of Jakarta.
_	This find strengthens the evidence that Vázquez de Coronado found the Teyas in Blanco Canyon.
_	Osborn said Peter was the original—having faked the evidence that revealed Peter's status as the clone as part of a plan to break Peter's spirit—a claim that was confirmed when Ben died saving Peter's life and his body degenerated like any other clone's.
_	The issues and the way they are approached vary between time periods, people, and organizations but the evidence that librarians have been promoting human rights in the U.S. is irrefutable.
_	Its continued use is defended by references to the "therapeutic imperative" to do something in the case of psychiatric patients who have not responded to other forms of treatment, and the evidence that some patients see improvement in their symptoms following surgery.
_	""From the evidence that has been received by the Committee regarding the use of triamcinolone at Team Sky during the period under investigation, and particularly in 2012, we believe that this powerful corticosteroid was being used to prepare Bradley Wiggins, and possibly other riders supporting him, for the Tour de France.
_	The jury was overwhelmed by emotions and did not sufficiently analyze the evidence that this was deliberate, calculated murder."
_	Jordan's version of Mrs. Stanford's demise was largely accepted until the appearance of several publications in 2003 emphasizing the evidence that she was murdered.
_	The male services hypothesis is praised for its ability to account for the evidence that swellings do not always precisely indicate ovulation; the lack of precision is likely to extend the duration of mate guarding and consortship behaviours outlined by the hypothesis.
_	Considering all of the evidence that Allen was a thoughtful and frugal businessman, it may simply demonstrate that using common parts was less expensive than designing new ones.
_	The juror said the verdict was not intended to be a rebuke to the Bush administration, rather, "...it came down to the evidence that we were allowed to see."
_	A drawback of this approach is that it over-states the evidence that some of the alternative hypotheses are true when the test statistics are positively correlated, which commonly occurs in practice. .
_	All of the examples provided prior to this have described the evidence that evolution has occurred, but has not provided the major underlying mechanism: natural selection.
_	"The absence of an identified BLL without deleterious effects, combined with the evidence that these effects appear to be irreversible, underscores the critical importance of primary prevention."
_	The evidence supporting the agency's conclusion must be substantial in consideration of the record as a whole, even including the evidence that is not consistent with the agency's conclusion.
_	A 2009 systematic review indicated that fluorosis is associated with consumption of infant formula or of water added to reconstitute the formula, that the evidence was distorted by publication bias, and that the evidence that the formula's fluoride caused the fluorosis was weak.
_	But,fossil records show that Theropoda dinosaur groups like Dromaeosauridae, Compsognathidae, Oviraptorosauria, Therizinosauridae and even Tyrannosauroidea which were likely to had feathers made the evidence that these were theropds and even prehistoric basal birds.
_	Neither of the two candidates could actually speak in the House of Commons until a committee determined the election, and it accepted the evidence that the Liberal candidate (Pryse) had outpolled the Conservative (Harford) by 305 to 285, enough to make his election secure, so he was given the seat.
_	Royal charters from the evidence that Vlachs (or Romanians) were present in Banat.
_	It reflected on this attitude by noting that "All is painfully familiar, the only novelty in the recent epidemic is the evidence that [the] American government itself—or at least part of it—is more anxious to provide ammunition for the miscontents than to correct their wild misstatements.".
_	PolitiFact rated the claim as "mostly false", noting that "experts were universal in saying that the evidence that Medicaid expansion is somehow fueling the opioid crisis doesn't exist."
_	However, Hank discovers the sea water appearing from the ground is the evidence that Alexander's calculations are wrong, and that the island will sink in a couple of days.
_	Field's evidence was enough to ensure that Blake was convicted, although his account was not consistent with the evidence that he gave at Sheppard's trial.
_	Sathit decides to stalk and bother her to find the evidence that she's an evil and manipulative temptress.
_	It said that Lichte had ruled for a non-prosecution based "on his own professional and impartial judgment of the facts of the case and the evidence that was available."
_	But Warfield starts with the evidence that the Bible is a historical document, rather than with the presupposition that it is inspired.
_	In the evidence that Margaret Kennedy gave before the Select Committee in September 1890, Margaret Kennedy claimed that she and Julia Farrell had been secretly panning for gold before Henry Frencham arrived, evidence that was substantiated by others.
_	According to some scholars, during his reign, Nabataean power decreased and it lost control of Damascus while others state the evidence that Nabataeans formally controlled Damascus in the 34 to 40 period is very weak to nonexistent.
_	The following table shows, in a condensed form, the efforts of many scientists and the evidence that they found, as well as their idea of what it could mean for the formation of early Archean continental crust.
_	His sobriety in constant jeopardy, Graham, for all his failings, never for a moment doubts his son's innocence, and begins a frantic last-minute effort to find the evidence that will save his son's life, if not redeem himself as a father.
_	Coakley later defended her actions by saying she acted appropriately with the evidence that was available at the time.
_	When mental health professionals fail to undertake comprehensive, impartial, and scientifically informed assessments, they risk challenges to the admissibility of the evidence that they present to court and having it dismissed as poor or "junk science."
_	This report supplies the evidence that no other educational intervention works as well as acceleration for gifted students.
_	Members of the anti-globalization movement argue that positive data from countries which largely ignored neoliberal prescriptions, notably China, discredits the evidence that pro-globalists present.
_	Much of the evidence that has come to light since the executive order was not available to the Tripartite Commission for the Restitution of Monetary Gold before it disbanded, although Yugoslavia was among the recipients of restitution.
_	She tries to turn Julian in, but he hides the evidence that proves he killed Carlos.
_	The category is included here because of the evidence that children with moderate to severe intellectual disability (IQ below 35) who exhibit major problems in hyperactivity and inattention frequently show stereotyped behaviours; such children tend not to benefit from stimulant drugs (unlike those with an IQ in the normal range) and may exhibit a severe dysphoric reaction (sometimes with psychomotor retardation) when given stimulants; in adolescence the overactivity tends to be replaced by underactivity (a pattern that is not usual in hyperkinetic children with normal intelligence).
_	While Damien distracts the guards, Leïto breaks into Gassman's office to steal his hard-drive for the evidence that they need.
_	Nevertheless, his consideration of the problem in his 2010 paper leads him to the conclusion that despite this inherent uncertainty, the evidence that human activity is causing global warming is substantial, and that it is therefore 'safer to act, to mitigate and adapt with the aim of slowing down change'.
_	It appeared from the evidence that on June 23, 1966, the accused, a white male carpenter employed in the Department of Water Affairs, was assisting one Mostert, the crane operator in charge of loading pipes onto a lorry from a crane fitted on the back thereof, also an employee of the Department.
_	The monasteries formed a network; "all of them were under state supervision" and there existed "a system of co-ordination among them ... it seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pāla were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	The California Superior Court decided in 1990 that Buchwald had demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that his story treatment and Paramount's unsuccessful scripts based on the treatment were "similar" to that of the "Coming to America" movie.
_	Together with the evidence that Murphy and Landis previously had access to Buchwald's treatment, the court determined that the movie's story was indeed "based upon" Buchwald's treatment.
_	A "Los Angeles Times" editorial cites the evidence that the name is offensive to many, which the poll does not change given its questionable representation of Native American opinion.
_	Hannity said that the verdict was legally correct, and that all of the evidence that was presented by the prosecution was either impeached or contradicted by the defense.
_	Experts further noted the evidence that while more than 740,000 men, women, and children die each year as a result of armed violence, the majority of these deaths – 490,000 – occur in countries that are not affected by conflict.
_	The chief engineer possesses the key and when locked, the system cannot be tampered with and equally importantly provides the evidence that the vessel has been compliant.
_	Bowyer disagreed with Clarke's team on the supposed link between the radar traces and ferries, and proposed that two solid airborne craft, which were not and could not have been manufactured on Earth, were working in unison that day, as suggested by the evidence that their sortie was coordinated in both time and space.
_	J was inclined to draw adverse inferences from some of the murkier omissions in the evidence that Lord Ashcroft had given.
_	With the evidence that it was a suicide and not a murder, Grey manages to clear Jack of any wrongdoing at the police court.
_	The eating habits of these animals are not fully known: they have been suggested to have been either carnivorous, herbivorous, mollusk-eating or egg-eating (the evidence that originally supported the latter is no longer considered valid); these options are not necessarily incompatible.
_	Although they give the detective a false alibi, we learn in flashbacks that they actually went to the yacht to get rid of the evidence that might tie Nico to Jonathan's demise.
_	In Washington, Walter Skinner tells agent Dana Scully that the FBI's investigation into her sister's murder has been made inactive, despite the evidence that had been recovered.
_	(The document was part of the evidence that the BBC was to submit to the Pilkington Committee on Broadcasting, concerning newspaper shareholdings in Independent Television companies.)
_	The player's main task is to look for contradictions in the witness statements and present the evidence that contradicts their statement.
_	She is recorded in the official transcript of her address as saying that she was 'disappointed' with the result, and that she 'was of the clear opinion that the evidence that was made available to the court was sufficient to put before the jury to allow it the opportunity to decide on the case against Sinclair'.
_	Historians are divided about the strength of the evidence that she was Sweyn Forkbeard's sister.
_	There can also be corroborating evidence related to a certain source, such as what makes an author think a certain way due to the evidence that was supplied by witnesses or objects.
_	Safety in numbers is also used to describe the evidence that the number of pedestrians or cyclists correlates inversely with the risk of a motorist colliding with a pedestrian or cyclist.
_	Early in 1972 the two sides settled after the evidence that was provided had been evaluated.
_	The programme reviewed the evidence that was currently publicly available but did not come to a conclusion on what happened to Madeleine.
_	During the evidentiary stage, the judge is presented with the evidence that will inform his final decision.
_	Chief Engineer Griffin, who had been recruited in Glasgow, provided much of the evidence that convicted the three.
_	"People's desire to believe in the paranormal is stronger than all the evidence that it does not exist."
_	In 2011, Andrew Wadge, the chief scientist of the United Kingdom's Food Standards Agency, commented on a 2011 US study on dietary exposure of adult humans to BPA, saying, "This corroborates other independent studies and adds to the evidence that BPA is rapidly absorbed, detoxified, and eliminated from humans – therefore is not a health concern."
_	Because of the evidence that vision has on reaction time, it is clear that vision is capable of manipulating the perception an individual has on an environment, and results in what Tastevin considered visual capture.
_	All the evidence that was heard was about whether the material had the ability to harm and corrupt.
_	The chelicerae of "Acutiramus" likely served as slicing or shearing devices, adding to the evidence that it would have occupied a distinct ecological niche.
_	Meanwhile, Kai brings Jini to Macau to meet with Yang Du-hi and General Wei, and shows Jini the evidence that Yang Du-hi had fabricated.
_	Meiners studied the physical, mental and moral characteristics of each race, and built a race hierarchy based on the evidence that was considered common in scientific and anthropological circles at the time.
_	All the evidence that supports the passive margin model is also problematic for this model, since the strong paleontological, lithological, and sedimentological relationships between Lesser and Tethyan Himalaya basically rejects the connotation that they were once separated.
_	Meanwhile, the mother video tape with the full interview, which could have shed light on the context, got lost, so the evidence that can be used in the trial is limited to the parts of the interview that have been broadcast.
_	Most surprising is the evidence that has emerged regarding the burgeoning numbers of strictly Orthodox Jews who have given serious consideration to this end-of-life option.
_	Despite the evidence that groups are different from each other, we tend to believe that deep inside all people are the same.
_	In several prominent cases, the evidence that the government successfully excluded was later revealed to contain no state secrets: "United States v. Reynolds", "Sterling v. Tenet", "Edmonds v. Department of Justice", and the "Pentagon Papers".
_	This was consistent with the evidence that samples she took at home had extremely high levels of contamination, while samples taken in "fresh" jars at the plant and at Los Alamos showed much lower contamination.
_	In 2009, the World Organization Against Torture called for a letter-writing campaign on Jigme Gyatso's behalf in light of the evidence that he had been mistreated by prison authorities.
_	"New York Times" columnist Safire updated his description of Hillary Clinton to "habitual prevaricator", saying "the evidence that she has been lying all along is damning" and comparing her dark side to that of Richard Nixon, in whose White House he had once worked.
_	The universe could be infinite in extent or it could be finite; but the evidence that leads to the inflationary model of the early universe also implies that the "total universe" is much larger than the observable universe, and so any edges or exotic geometries or topologies would not be directly observable as light has not reached scales on which such aspects of the universe, if they exist, are still allowed.
_	It was this combination, "extinct faunal remains" + "human artifacts", that provided the evidence that came to be seen as crucial.
_	It appeared from the evidence that Abrahams had not been in a financial position to afford purchasing another vehicle, or even to pay the deposit.
_	Over the last two decades, the evidence that better glycemic control (i.e., keeping blood glucose and HbA1c levels as close to normal as possible) reduces the rates of many complications of diabetes has become overwhelming.
_	However, Davidson is killed by Reese, who destroys the evidence that he was connected with Vargas as he needs Fusco to enter HR.
_	Abandoned by their government and left for dead, the weary soldiers race to uncover the evidence that will prove their innocence while ensuring that the violence is contained.
_	A stranger known as Uncle Grubstake (Lockney) has become friendly with Bud and Betty's brother David (Goodwin), and when the citizens attempt to hang Bud for robbing the coach, Grubstake reveals his true identity as a federal agent, and has the evidence that gets Pressley and his gang arrested.
_	What Duke could never escape, though, was all the evidence that he truly was a neo-Nazi, rather than what he claimed to be: a next-generation Reaganite conservative with a long-ago tawdry Ku Klux Klan past that he had thoroughly put behind him.
_	Although there have been informers throughout history – the Kray twins were partly convicted two years before Smalls on evidence given by Leslie Payne – the Smalls case was significant for three reasons: the first informer to give the police volume names of his associates and provide the evidence that would send dozens of them to prison to serve long sentences; the first criminal informer to strike a written deal with the Director of Public Prosecutions; the only criminal informer to serve no time for his crime in return for providing Queen's evidence.
_	He explains that no one would believe her due to her mental history, and that he has destroyed all the evidence that could link him to the murders.
_	The five monasteries formed a network; "all of them were under state supervision" and there existed "a system of co-ordination among them . . it seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pāla were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	The importance of Augustus’s reign is supported by the evidence that Domitian decided to renovate the instrument and keep it dedicated to Augustus.
_	A report issued by the Deputy Prime Minister's Office reviewed the evidence that overcrowding, in addition to the known impacts on physical health, adversely effects mental health, and child development.
_	Despite the evidence that acceleration is a beneficial practice when implemented correctly, many teachers and parents are reluctant to accelerate students.
_	In a report to the 1907 annual meeting of the British Association for the Advancement of Science, Edwin Stephen Goodrich amassed all the evidence that "Polypterus" is not a crossopterygian, placing it within the palaeoniscids, the most primitive of the ray-finned (actinopterygian) fishes.
_	Already, we take a stand against Taldir-Jaffrennou's monstrous project, which singularly corroborates all the evidence that we have from Vichy.
_	But in truth, these beverages had falsified the evidence that they were medically fit to be sold to consumers.
_	Swedish director in his 7-year search for the evidence that might help explain how the same woman who was Morgan's savior would become his killer at the instant he was retaking the bandstand for the last set at Slug's Saloon, a jazz club on the Bowery in lower East Manhattan.
_	The book retraces the evidence that the American administration , motivated by coal-industry donations to the Republican party, undermines political action by omitting mention of climate change from government documents.
_	The court will request that the defendant appear at a show cause hearing at which the prosecutor must demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant committed a probation violation.
_	Although dual Five-Columns Monuments could have existed on both the western and eastern Rostra, the evidence that remains is located at the Augustan western Rostra.
_	An assize of seven earls and fourteen lesser nobles were appointed to hear the evidence that linked the prisoners to the rebellion in the Lennox.
_	Doyle had met his burden of showing that one of the actions for which the board terminated him was constitutionally protected speech, "the District Court should have gone on to determine whether the Board had shown by a preponderance of the evidence that it would have reached the same decision as to respondent's re-employment even in the absence of the protected conduct."
_	In "Contra Windschuttle", an article published in the conservative publication "Quadrant", S.G. Foster examined some of the evidence that Windschuttle presented on one issue, Stanner's notion of the "Great Australian Silence".
_	If the applicant satisfies the court in this respect, the court must make a dissolution order unless it is not convinced by the evidence that the partnership has indeed broken down irretrievably.
_	Once both prosecution and defence have concluded leading evidence, the case goes to summing up where firstly the prosecution and then the defence get to sum up their case based on the evidence that has been heard.
_	Robert M. Price argues that the evidence that the early church fathers, such as Clement, Ignatius, and Polycarp, knew of the Pauline epistles is unclear, and concludes that Marcion was the first person to collect Paul's writings to various churches and to treat ten Pauline letters, some of them Marcion's own compositions, together with an earlier version of Luke (not the Gospel of Luke as now known):
_	David Carter in the third chapter of his book questions the evidence that these claims are based on.
_	Therefore, an expert witness should only offer their opinion as to the facts that have already been established in court, and "should not hinder the trier of fact's duty by telling them how to assess the evidence that they have heard".
_	The pair found the evidence that linked Jenna to Jeffrey’s crimes and destroyed it.
_	The defense, however, has neither stated whether or not his mother was actually Filipina, nor refuted the evidence that McLurkin was black.
_	Against this theory is the evidence that in fact careful seasonal fires from Aboriginal land management practices reduced fuel loads, and prevent wildfires like those seen since European settlement.
_	In December 2002 Senator Graham himself revealed in a PBS interview that "I was surprised at the evidence that there were foreign governments involved in facilitating the activities of at least some of the terrorists in the United States."
_	Generally speaking, a grand jury may issue an indictment for a crime, also known as a "true bill," only if it finds, based upon the evidence that has been presented to it, that there is probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed by a criminal suspect.
_	Law enforcement agencies never followed through on the evidence that the bombing was an attempt on Bari's life and the crime would go unsolved.
_	In 2014, he was interviewed by "National Geographic" about "Dead Mountain" and the evidence that he found.
_	However, the evidence that cryotherapy reduces pain and swelling is very weak and the benefits after total knee replacement surgery have been shown to be very small.
_	Pinpointing the exact cause or causes of the Permian–Triassic extinction event is difficult, mostly because the catastrophe occurred over 250 million years ago, and since then much of the evidence that would have pointed to the cause has been destroyed or is concealed deep within the Earth under many layers of rock.
_	It is also important for the evidence that survives of the gaol and the principles of its radiating design, and as an archaeological site, has the potential reveal information about the earlier functioning of the place as a gaol.
_	On 16 October Acuña asked for a dismissal of a case against Bernal's Itaipú associates Wilfrido Taboada Molinas, Rulfo René Velilla Aguilera, and Guido Roque Zacarías Michelagnoli, saying that the evidence that Itaipú funds had been used to pay Colorado Party campaign expenses was inconclusive.
_	Specific cases, such as that of patient ML, support the evidence that severe blows to the head can cause the onset of RA.
_	Other geologists also believed that the evidence that Wegener had provided was not sufficient.
_	Tanja the evidence that can prove her innocence and they both try to be civil with each other.
_	That force will now break into government information vaults and bring to light the evidence that will reveal corruption and nefarious doings."
_	"We now know from the evidence that one of the risk groups within that age cohort of 15–25 is the young male homosexual.
_	Extensive research conducted by Professor Gregory Hadley and James Oglethorpe and published in the "Journal of Military History" in 2007 subsequently showed that the evidence that purported to indict James Godwin was a later fabrication created to further political causes in the 1990s.
_	There is, however, testimony by Eisenhower Administration officials, and ambiguity and lack of clarity in the records of high-level policy meetings, which tends to contradict the evidence that the President intended an assassination effort against Lumumba.
_	Concerning the complainant, Regina Walsh, the evidence that had not been disclosed to the defence included that she:
_	Her UK lawyers were unable to view any of the evidence that led to the warrant in Germany and only following discoveries made by a German television program and the appointment of a German lawyer to examine the files in Germany did it become clear that she had no case to answer.
_	Given the evidence that the vagus nerve plays a crucial role in heart rate regulation by modulating the response of sinoatrial node, vagal tone can be quantified by investigating heart rate modulation induced by vagal tone changes.
_	"Buchwaldoboletus lignicola" is in the same clade as "C. piperatus" and is thought to be a parasite as well, strengthening the evidence that "C. piperatus" and its relatives may be mycoparasites.
_	There are mixed opinions on whether it causes distress when used on its own, with human experiments lending support to the evidence that it can cause distress and equivocal results in non-humans.
_	The declaration called the evidence that HIV causes AIDS "clear-cut, exhaustive and unambiguous".
_	Clinical use of semicarbazide (a SSAO-inhibitor) gives the evidence that an inflammatory reaction can be reduced by blocking the enzymatic activity of the enzyme semicarbazide-sensitive amine oxidase (SSAO).
_	However, the evidence that Smith originated the doctrine consists only of Young's own assertions, an 1877 recollection of Anson Call, and some circumstantial evidence collected by Mormon fundamentalist writers.
_	The results were accepted by all sides and many historians seem this election as the evidence that the dark times of civil unrest and conflict after electoral processes that end in the Civil War were put behind for good.
_	The Court said that the evidence that Kodak controls nearly 100% of the parts market and 80% to 95% of the service market, with no readily available substitutes, was sufficient to survive summary judgment under the stringent monopoly standard of § 2.
_	A profile of Swedish diplomat Raoul Wallenberg, the film covered his role in saving the lives of Jewish refugees from the Holocaust, as well as exploring the evidence that he may still have been alive in a Soviet gulag as late as the early 1980s.
_	The 17th Civil Chamber of the Rio de Janeiro Court of Justice ruled that the application was unfounded, based on the evidence that the defendants presented that two professional writers made the plot of the films, which was also supported by an expert.
_	In November 2014 he presided over the immigration fraud trial of Rasmea Odeh, and told the jury that he thought its guilty verdict was "a fair and reasonable one based on the evidence that came in."
_	Atom Smasher's team ambushes the Black Marvel Family, getting Waller the evidence that she needs to expose their threat to the world.
_	During this time, Kim is working on finding out about the evidence that was used to convict her ancestor.
_	Ami states that Benny Morris' conclusion is not supported by the evidence that he himself (Morris) presents such as his statement that, "cultured officers . . . had turned into base murderers and this not in the heat of battle . . . but out of a system of expulsion and destruction; the less Arabs remained, the better; this principle is the political motor for the expulsions and the atrocities".
_	However, even in 1958 the theoretical flaws in the hypothesis were observed, aside from the evidence that was coming in at the same time from the first gamma ray measurement satellites.
_	"In the 1980s archaeologists found the evidence that Rome's soldiers in
_	A widely circulated story holds that the word gadget was "invented" when Gaget, Gauthier & Cie, the company behind the repoussé construction of the Statue of Liberty (1886), made a small-scale version of the monument and named it after their firm; however this contradicts the evidence that the word was already used before in nautical circles, and the fact that it did not become popular, at least in the USA, until after World War I.
_	On the other hand, internal auditors move on checklists that may not surface the evidence that the jury or regulatory bodies look for.
_	Pan (1998) summarizes the evidence that activation at the pharmacological level of the KOR antagonizes various MOR-mediated actions in the brain.
_	Homicide has two days to find the evidence that he killed the woman and raped two others, before he leaves the country.
_	The "New York Times" reported that Westmoreland had "surrendered to the evidence that . . . he and some of his aides in Vietnam in 1967 manipulated the estimates of enemy strength, apparently for political effect."
_	The archaeological sites, old Masjeed, Tomb, destructive Fort provides the evidence that Nasarpur is a historical city.
_	Domhoff does not dispute the evidence that dream control is possible, and that dream-control techniques can be beneficial in specific conditions such as the treatment of nightmares: he cites the work of the psychiatrists Bernard Kraków and Isaac Marks in this regard.
_	He does, however, dispute some of the claims of the DreamWorks movement, and also the evidence that dream discussion groups, as opposed to individual motivation and ability, make a significant difference in being able to dream lucidly, and to be able to do so consistently.
_	Another part of the exhibit provided the evidence that there was formerly a large hall on the "Kleiner Müggelberg" which probably served as a place of ritual worship for the Sprewanen.
_	Johns further noted that the evidence of diffusion of crops was imperfect, that Watson made "too many minor slips and larger errors" such as getting dates wrong or claiming that a 1439 document was Norman, and had failed to make best use of the evidence that was available, such as of the decline of classical agriculture, or even to mention the changing geomorphology.
_	After the defense finishes presenting its case, each side gives a closing statement summarizing the evidence that supports its position of either guilt or innocence.
_	Following an introduction and a discussion of the complaint, more than three-quarters of the written judgment is devoted to an analysis of all the evidence that was presented.
_	This idea is supported by the evidence that the behavior is present while there are only eggs and larvae in the nest but stops after many of the larvae have pupated.
_	It is unclear if the evidence that has been found of the Susquehanna in the area is the result of the movement of small bands into the area, or if it was part of a trade network with other Native cultures already resident there.
_	Mathias finally decides to not pay out the life insurance and to burn all the evidence that would lead to the sisters' downfall, so that neither the sisters nor the insurance agents get into trouble.
_	Ware wrote: "I believe after reviewing all the evidence that no trier of fact can conclude Staff Sgt. Wuterich formed the criminal intent to kill.
_	Graham's sister, Isabel LeBourdais, was a journalist whose 1966 book "The Trial of Steven Truscott" played a key role in disputing the evidence that led to Steven Truscott's controversial murder conviction, and her brother John Erichsen-Brown was a diplomat with the Canadian Department of External Affairs.
_	Its discovery added to the evidence that Madagascar and the Seychelles separated from the Indian landmass sometime well after the breakup of Gondwana had started.
_	Some are reasonable interpretations of the evidence that happen to be false.
_	This phrase became popular after the publication in 1831 of a paper by Mantell entitled "The Age of Reptiles" that summarised the evidence that there had been an extended geological era when giant reptiles has swarmed the land, air, and sea.
_	A 1995 paper published in the "Journal of Biosciences" detailed the evidence that the glandular bracts played a distinct role in defense of the flower and were also capable of digesting captured prey and absorbing the nutrients.
_	Among the evidence that Yeatman offers, is Collins' signature on the will itself.
_	For example, in a legal argument, a prosecutor must first declare the charges against the defendant and provide the relevant facts; then he must present the evidence that proves guilt.
_	However, while essential, experts noted the evidence that an effective response has, in itself, only a limited impact on reducing the number of new incidents of violence.
_	Another reviewer said that in the book the author "presents a strong indictment of the evidence that dictates medical practice, a challenge that is credible only because Abramson backs up his statements with detailed analyses of the prevailing evidence".
_	A colleague also from the University of Adelaide stated that "While the evidence that Zika virus is responsible for the rise in microcephaly in Brazil is not conclusive, the role of pyriproxyfen is simply not plausible."
_	This discovery of nitrates adds to the evidence that Mars once had life.
_	D provides the evidence that the “baby” figure is, in fact, God K.
_	The Silencer is an unnamed mob enforcer who joined some gang members into looking for the evidence that linked the crime boss Alphonse Scarpetti to the courthouse killings.
_	The inscription is among the evidence that Judaism was not isolated from the general religious environment of the Imperial world, since a "rosatio" could be made without accompanying sacrifices at the tomb.
_	He told "Newsweek" this added to the evidence that Trump may have engaged in obstruction of justice, and compared it to the Watergate scandal.
_	He gave the evidence that directly linked the defendants to heroin trafficking.
_	“It is clear from the evidence that excellence does not emerge without appropriate help….
_	In order to break the debate, the player must find a lie or contradiction amongst the weak points and shoot it with a bullet containing the evidence that contradicts it.
_	Highlighting these mutually exclusive claims about the designer, Dembski, despite having said that the intelligent designer or designers could be any god or gods, or even space aliens, has also said that "intelligent design should be understood as the evidence that God has placed in nature to show that the physical world is the product of intelligence and not simply the result of mindless material forces" and that "Intelligent design is just the Logos theology of John's Gospel restated in the idiom of information theory."
_	This is despite the evidence that paracetamol and NSAIDs have some similar pharmacological activity.
_	Wilkie described this as being part of the evidence that Labor would better be able to offer a more stable, competent and ethical government than the Coalition.
_	But the faithful dog comes to rescue, collects the evidence that Raghupati, Raghab and Rajaram are the culprits.
_	These two races have dominated the landscape of modern mythology for countless centuries, almost washing away the evidence that a third ever existed.
_	This powerful image is no longer considered accurate given the evidence that exists for a simpler predator-prey relationship between whale and squid, with the whale being the predator and the squid the prey.
_	The authorities hesitated, appearing to be embarrassed by the evidence that Cott was right, and argued that countershading would be too difficult to use as an expert zoologist would be needed to supervise every installation.
_	He argues they were added to reinforce the evidence that the body of Jesus was gone.
_	The scientific community considers the evidence that HIV causes AIDS to be conclusive and rejects AIDS-denialist claims as pseudoscience based on conspiracy theories, faulty reasoning, cherry picking, and misrepresentation of mainly outdated scientific data.
_	This exclusion persists against the evidence that the added value of early childhood care and education services are higher for them than for their more affluent counterparts, even when such services are of modest quality.
_	An important aspect of the creativity profiling approach is to account for the tension between predicting the creative profile of an individual, as characterised by the psychometric approach, and the evidence that team creativity is founded on diversity and difference.
_	From the perspective of different family members, the simulation is constructed from the "brain data" of Raymond, his wife, and their young son, they'll move through their home, discover their secrets and collect the evidence that they need to repair their lives.
_	UK journalist and author Linda Melvern, in her book “Conspiracy to Murder” repeatedly cited White’s “methodical and thorough” cross-examination of Col. Bagosora for the significance of the evidence that was adduced.
_	Ogg, insists against all the evidence that he is a sweet, harmless kitten.
_	However, the Court relies on the evidence that was adduced in the court below and only permits new evidence to be admitted on special grounds.
_	He further argues that the evidence that selfish tendencies are natural must not be taken as evidence that selfishness is "right."
_	On December 23, 2011, Carrie and Rafe managed to find the evidence that would clear John's name.
_	Instead, the primary purpose of a judgment is: to identify the ultimate issues in the case; to set out, qualitatively by reference to the evidence that is accepted or rejected, the primary facts which the judge finds; to relate those findings to the factual issues in the case; to show how any inference has been drawn; to make the necessary findings of fact; to identify and apply the appropriate legal principles; and, ultimately, to make the appropriate dispositive orders'.
_	The High Court concluded that it did not have the authority to make recommendation in the area of foreign affairs, but said that the evidence that the British residents were being tortured was "powerful".
_	Despite the evidence that they were not related, Renée refused to leave David.
_	Under the Sales Act, it does not matter whether it was established on the evidence that the transaction between the plaintiff and the defendant was a sale of food, or a contract for entertainment, in order to be submitted to a jury.
_	He concluded that "the Board has established by a preponderance of the evidence that Doyle would not have been renewed because of the incidents—exclusive of the radio incident—which had occurred during the year or so prior to the nonrenewal" and ruled in its favor.
_	It is written and presented by author Joseph Pearce about William Shakespeare, and specifically the evidence that his religion was Catholic.
_	When, however, the evidence regarding the clothing, the purchaser and the timer is taken with the evidence that an unaccompanied bag was taken from KM180 to PA103A, the inference that that was the primary suitcase becomes, in our view, irresistible.
_	Brown wrote that "Mamet ignores the evidence that doesn’t fit his thesis, so that in the end "Phil Spector" becomes less an 'exploration' [of the relationship between Spector and Kenney Baden] than an act of advocacy," and he described the movie as "dishonest."
_	Also, the evidence that Hernando and Inzenga were unfairly profiting from the work of their colleagues, together with the economic pressure from a few singers, forced an apport of extra capital and the restructuring of the society, being that Oudrid, Inzenga and Hernando were then excluded from it for not having sufficient assets to take care of the required capital.
_	Given the evidence that bottle-feeding is a risk factor for the development of postpartum depression, the authors hypothesize that it may be related to the biological signals that occur when breastfeeding is interrupted, which simulates child loss.
_	Their relationship is not very well documented, but the evidence that they enjoyed each other's company and greatly respected each other's work is strong, and suggests that the elder Haydn acted in at least a minor capacity as a mentor to Mozart.
_	Kirsty and David teamed up to expose Ian, and finally found the evidence that they were looking for.
_	The Kaspé case become an international "cause célèbre", attracting much media attention around the world, ultimately leading to two trials in Harbin in 1935 and 1936, as the evidence that the Russian Fascist gang who had killed Kaspé was working for the "Kempeitai", the military police of the Imperial Japanese Army, become too strong for even Tokyo to ignore.
_	Simpson pointed to tainted evidence that had been collected by Scarcella, deciding that “the revelation of Detective Scarcella’s malfeasance in fabricating false-identification evidence gravely undermines the evidence that convicted the defendants in this case.”
_	It could not discover from the evidence that there had been any misconduct or error of judgment on the part of the captain or officers.
_	This involves both the notion of personality difficulty as a measure of subthreshold scores for personality disorder using standard interviews and the evidence that those with the most severe personality disorders demonstrate a “ripple effect” of personality disturbance across the whole range of mental disorders.
_	One provision of this law is that no penalty may be imposed if, by a preponderance of the evidence that the act was in self-defense.
_	At the other end of the scale, the curators of the Germanisches Nationalmuseum in Nuremberg, Germany straightforwardly list on their website a three-manual harpsichord, listing its inscription (correctly) as "Bartholomeo Christofari Patavinus fecit Florentiae 1703"; i.e. Bartolomeo Cristofori, but not mentioning the evidence that it is not by Cristofori at all but is rather a Franciolini fraud.
_	The large share of elderly inflation averse voters may also hinder the political attractiveness of pursuing higher inflation consistent with the evidence that ageing may lead to lower inflation.
_	When the attorney confronted Epps with the evidence that Platt/Northup was a free man, with a wife and children, Epps first demanded of the enslaved man why he had not told him this at the time of purchase.
_	As she later stated on Snapped, "I could have tried to see what a jury would give me, or I could just take the evidence that was there and accept the fact that, even though I don"t remember doing this, I obviously was involved in it".
_	It seems from the evidence that the different seats of Buddhist learning that functioned in eastern India under the Pāla were regarded together as forming a network, an interlinked group of institutions," and it was common for great scholars to move easily from position to position among them.
_	And increasingly we become so secure in our bubbles that we start accepting only information, whether it’s true or not, that fits our opinions, instead of basing our opinions on the evidence that is out there."
_	Charity agrees to give Zoe custody of Noah for the evidence that Chris committed suicide.
_	Betty the evidence that would result in Claire being found not guilty by reason of temporary insanity.
_	The De Vere Society is a group set up to put forward the evidence that Edward de Vere, 17th Earl of Oxford was the real author of the works of William Shakespeare.
_	It was suggested on the evidence that the open window had been the cause of the pneumonia, but the court found that it was the broken ribs, causing difficulty in breathing, which had caused the pneumonia.
_	Thus, as the MPC §1.13(9) definition indicates, the attendant circumstances will be the evidence that must be adduced to prove all the elements required to constitute the offense and, under §1.13(9)(c) to disprove any excuse or justification.
_	However, he states: "... I find most of the evidence that has been marshalled to support the theory of Indo-Aryan migrations into the subcontinent to be inconclusive upon careful scrutiny, but on the other, I have not been convinced by an Out-of-India position, since there has been very little of significance offered so far in support of it."
_	Neither of the two candidates could actually speak in the House of Commons until a committee determined the election, and it accepted the evidence that the Liberal candidate (Pryse) had outpolled the Conservative (Harford) by 305 to 285, enough to make his election secure, so he was given the seat.
_	In 1988, a panel of the Institute of Medicine of the U.S. National Academy of Sciences found that "the evidence that HIV causes AIDS is scientifically conclusive."
_	Based on the evidence that his father's name was also L. Varius Ambibulus, his sister's name is Varia, and his freedmen were Varii, Olli Salomies concludes his original name was Lucius Varius Ambibulus, and the terms of a testamentary adoption directed Ambibulus to add the name of a Quintus Planius Sardus Ambibulus to his in return for a share of the latter's estate.
_	He also concluded that the majority disregarded the evidence that the mediators were negotiating with the employer on behalf of the union.
_	The book was used in the evidence that he presented to the Aliens Commission in its inquiries.
_	The first expanded the evidence that can be considered when establishing that a peremptory challenge was based solely on objectionable criteria.
_	Although the sexual inviolability of underage male citizens is usually emphasized, this anecdote is among the evidence that even the most well-born youths might go through a phase in which they could be viewed as "sex objects".
_	The lurid details of the case aroused huge public interest, in particular the evidence that the couple had been too preoccupied to notice that the painter was up a ladder in the same room.
_	Practice in a classroom is formative to the extent that evidence about student achievement is elicited, interpreted, and used by teachers, learners, or their peers, to make decisions about the next steps in instruction that are likely to be better, or better founded, than the decisions they would have taken in the absence of the evidence that was elicited.
_	When the reviewing court reviews the evidence that was before the original decision maker, on a question where the standard of review is patent unreasonableness, the reviewing court must determine whether "the evidence reasonably viewed is incapable of supporting the tribunal's findings" (para. 48).
_	During the first half of 1964, Read had been investigating their activities, but publicity and official denials of Ron's relationship with Boothby made the evidence that he collected useless.
_	Paine denied writing that he ever published anything before leaving for the United States, but it is thought that the evidence that he did is too compelling.
_	In response to the inclusion of AIDS denialists on Mbeki's panel, the Durban Declaration was drafted and signed by over 5,000 scientists and physicians, describing the evidence that HIV causes AIDS as "clear-cut, exhaustive and unambiguous".
_	US District Court Judge Emmet G. Sullivan insisted that the administration still had to hand over the evidence that justified the dirty bomb charge, and admonished United States Department of Justice lawyers that dropping the charge "raises serious questions in this court's mind about whether those allegations were ever true."
_	If such a 'black ring' could be produced in a particle accelerator such as the Large Hadron Collider, this would provide the evidence that higher dimensions exist.
_	Saul (Mandy Patinkin) presents President-elect Keane (Elizabeth Marvel) with the evidence that links Dar Adal (F. Murray Abraham) to Brett O'Keefe (Jake Weber).
_	If it is apparent from the evidence that, after receipt of the notice to appear in court in terms of section 65A(1), the judgment debtor made a written offer to pay the judgment debt in instalments or otherwise, or that the debtor is able to pay the debt in reasonable instalments, the court may order him to pay the judgment debt and costs in specified instalments, and may also authorise the issuing of an emoluments attachment order.
_	His colleague Pavel Korshunov quickly eliminates the evidence that proves Sobolev's guilt.
_	"It is apparent from the evidence that there was knowledge of this at all levels within the investigation team.
_	Despite all this, Buell finds the evidence that Melville changed his ambitions during writing "on the whole convincing".
_	It wasn’t entitled, at the same time, to hide the evidence that undermined Saldate’s credibility.
_	This incident also formed part of the evidence that led the FIA to withdraw Ide’s superlicence later in the season.
_	It provided the evidence that confirmed George Gamow's and Georges Lemaître's "Big Bang" theory of the creation of the universe.
_	In a report on Scottish Folds, the Breed Standards Advisory Council (BSAC) for New Zealand Cat Fancy (NZCF) states that "Breeders may not have appreciated the strength of the evidence that heterozygous cats can and do develop [feline] OCD."
_	This hypothesis is further supported by the evidence that "E. cruciger" only parasitizes "C. hederae" south of the Alps and probably represents a localised and specialised "race" of "E. cruciger" which has not been able to expand its distribution as its host has done.
_	More recent scholarship tends to agree Jan painted the panels based on the evidence that they are stylistically closer to Jan than Hubert, who died in 1426; and that Jan, who travelled across the Alps to Italy that year, painted the mountain range.
_	Watch has reported it found the evidence that cluster bomb has been used by the Russians in the attack which killed Storimans.
_	The district attorney who prosecuted him in that case, testified as to the evidence that had led to his conviction.
_	Carter (Taraji P. Henson) has taken over the Corwin investigation, using the evidence that Fusco (Kevin Chapman) secured.
_	Some publications have suggested that L-form bacteria might cause diseases in humans, and other animals but, as the evidence that links these organisms to disease is fragmentary and frequently contradictory, this hypothesis remains controversial.
_	These two reasons alone are enough for Paul (similar to the plot line of "The Fugitive") to seek out the evidence that will clear him and end the nightmare that put him and his family in hiding from the justice system, which seeks to capture him and the person who framed him.
_	While the villa model has gained little support, the evidence that it tried to deal with has led to further attempts at explanation.
_	We are convinced on the evidence that we have received, that if juries were to be reintroduced for scheduled offences, their verdicts would still be subject to the influences of intimidation, or the fear of it.
_	The report does not question Blair's personal belief that there was a case for war, only the way he presented the evidence that he had.
_	Due to saccadic masking, the eye/brain system not only hides the eye movements from the individual but also hides the evidence that anything has been hidden.
_	The employee would be terminated if the school board, after a hearing, determined by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee had engaged in "public homosexual activity" or "public homosexual conduct" and "that said activity or conduct render[ed] the employee unfit for service."
_	The series ends with Futaba and Kou seeking refuge from the rain at a temple like they did years before, which Futaba interprets as the evidence that something interesting has finally started for her.
_	As the director of a hospice who has seen her share of dying patients, the doctor describes herself as a former skeptic who was convinced by the evidence that the afterlife exists and that people like Marie have had a genuine view of it.
_	Leopold and Loeb made full confessions and took police on a hunt around Chicago to collect the evidence that would be used against them.
_	The current evidence points toward P-bodies as being scaffolding centers of miRNA function, especially due to the evidence that a knock down of GW182 disrupts P-body formation.
_	Based on the evidence that P-bodies sometimes are the site of mRNA decay and sometimes the mRNA can exit the P-bodies and re-initiate translation, the question remains of what controls this switch.
_	He rejects both, citing the evidence that the play presents of Hamlet's ability to take action: his impulsive murder of Polonius and his Machiavellian murder of Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
_	The Professor has studied the evidence that has been gathered during the course of the Inquiry and has returned with very sensible recommendations.
_	In the second part of his work, Gebser set out to document the evidence that he saw throughout various human endeavors.
_	"I am absolutely convinced from my experience and the evidence that I've gathered over the years of doing this that they are incredibly valuable."
_	Some may have centered on ritual marriages between deities, or between deities and their human consorts, although the evidence that ritual marriage was their purpose is ambiguous.
_	A case points is kop (ten) shows to be an incomplete number observing the evidence that ' mbwan shwak ' (11) suggests that we were a number away from "shwak" (twelve)."
_	To date, however, Bose has not reappeared to contradict the evidence that he died in the crash on Taiwan.
_	Scientific studies documenting the wide-spread alteration of sediment dynamics (i.e. sediment supply, sediment entrainment, transport, erosion, deposition and storage) by humans lead to the evidence that human activities have come to dominate erosional, depositional and geochemical processes in ecosystems.
_	Straw responded that whilst the matter of Sutcliffe's release was a parole board matter, "that all the evidence that I have seen on this case, and it's a great deal, suggests to me that there are no circumstances in which this man will be released".
_	On one hand, despite the field's movement toward community mental health services, currently "insufficient empirical research exists regarding the effectiveness of community treatment programs, and the evidence that does exist does not generalize to all types of community treatment."
_	The association between nucleotide excision repair capability and longevity is strengthened by the evidence that defects in nucleotide excision repair proteins in humans and rodents cause features of premature aging, as reviewed by Diderich.
_	However, the evidence that HIV causes AIDS is scientifically conclusive and the scientific community rejects and ignores AIDS-denialist claims as based on faulty reasoning, cherry picking, and misrepresentation of mainly outdated scientific data.
_	This was supported by the evidence that per precursor RNA cycles with the same phase as mature transcripts, and oscillate with respect to Zeitgeber Time (ZT).
_	In 2011, Andrew Wadge, the chief scientist of the United Kingdom's Food Standards Agency, commented on a 2011 US study on dietary exposure of adult humans to BPA, saying, "This corroborates other independent studies and adds to the evidence that BPA is rapidly absorbed, detoxified, and eliminated from humans – therefore is not a health concern."
_	Slope factors should always be accompanied by the "weight of-evidence" classification to indicate the strength of the evidence that the agent is a human carcinogen.
_	The family historian Augusta Corbet struggled hard to marshal the evidence that he might have been and he is often referred to as Sir Richard.
_	In 1989, the United States Supreme Court held that Price Waterhouse must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the decision regarding employment would have been the same if sex discrimination had not occurred.
_	In February 2001, the solicitor of a former BAE Systems employee, Edward Cunningham, notified Serious Fraud Office of the evidence that his client was holding which related to an alleged "slush fund".
_	Scalia argued that by reversing a conviction following "a full-dress criminal trial with its innumerable constitutional and statutory limitations upon the evidence that the prosecution can bring forward, and (in Michigan as in most States) the requirement of a unanimous guilty verdict by impartial jurors", the majority transformed plea bargaining from being an embarrassing "necessary evil" to being an embraced, constitutionally-protected institution of the criminal justice system.
_	The bodies of the killed Serbs were never exhumed, autopsies were never performed and much of the evidence that could have been used against the perpetrators of the crime was discarded.
_	Despite the threat, Andrea continued her investigation and finally found the evidence that she and Smithy needed to put Gabriel away.
_	Coins constitute part of the evidence that project the transmission of religious and political ideas in the last quarter of the 16th century.
_	Still, it is (or should be) common for the "Staatsanwaltschaft" to request the acquittal of the defendant if the evidence that came to light in the courtroom or before suggests he or she is innocent.
_	A theory that Iraq was behind the attacks, based upon the evidence that the powder was weaponized and some reports of alleged meetings between 9/11 conspirators and Iraqi officials, may have contributed to the momentum which ultimately led to the 2003 Invasion of Iraq.
_	The incontrovertibility of the evidence that the Templar priests did not mutilate the words of consecration in the mass is furnished in the Cypriote proceedings by ecclesiastics who had long dwelt with them in the East.
_	Generally speaking, as regards the law in Australia: where it is clear on the evidence that a private citizen, or security officer, in detaining a suspect, acted reasonably and the suspect unreasonably, then it is likely that the court will find in favour of the citizen or security officer and against the suspect if that suspect chooses, later, to sue the citizen for assault or false imprisonment.
_	The desirability of the cul-de-sac street type among home buyers is implied by the evidence that they often pay up to a 20% premium for a home on such a street, according to one study.
_	Many researchers believe that the evidence that a Hawthorne effect exists has been exaggerated.
_	American officials later acknowledged "that the evidence that prompted President Clinton to order the missile strike on the Shifa plant was not as solid as first portrayed.
_	It would seem from the evidence that in spite of Philip Skelton’s commendation of Fowler's great regard for religion, his main interests were in family, gardens and with little reverence for antiquities.
_	The trial judge ruled that the evidence that the defendant had suffered from a post-epileptic seizure would amount to a disease of the mind, not that of automatism.
_	He later tracks Kaitlin down and kills her, but the evidence that he leaves behind at the crime scene (photocopier toner from the WLVU press) leads to his arrest.
_	The legal case was the first recorded victory for small-tenants at will and the evidence that was heard at the eleven-hour trial paved the way for land reform in Scotland.
_	Caesium atomic clocks became operational in 1955, and quickly confirmed the evidence that the rotation of the earth fluctuated randomly.
_	US District Court Judge Ricardo Urbina had scheduled the session where the Executive Branch would file the evidence that justified classifying the remaining Uyghurs as "enemy combatants" for 7 October 2008.
_	This is supported by the evidence that Cos-1 cells transfected with the mannose receptor lacking its C-terminal tail are unable to endocytose "C. albicans" and "P. carinii".
_	Among the evidence that confirmed the painting's authenticity was a letter written by Vincent van Gogh to his brother Theo on 5 July 1888, describing a landscape that he had painted the previous day:
_	He was supposed to get enrolled in University of Berkeley but the evidence that he did study there varies.
_	The next day, February 4, Justice Hansley helped bolster the prosecution's case in a detailed review of the evidence that lasted four hours and offered little to exonerate the defendant.
_	An arbitration commission in 1931 determined that, "In the Kingsland Case the Commission finds upon the evidence that the fire was not caused by any German agent."
_	The overwhelming majority were in the Lowlands, where the kirk had more control, despite the evidence that basic magical beliefs were very widespread in the Highlands.
_	Rabbi Yosef proceeded to systematically discredit the evidence that the former marriage had ever taken place.
_	Franks defended his decision with the support of other prominent US military leaders, citing a lack of conclusive evidence that bin-Laden was at Tora Bora, but Bergen and other critics, including the Delta Force commander at Tora Bora, Dalton Fury, claimed that the evidence that bin-Laden was present at the battle was very robust; Fury claimed that his team came within 2,000 meters of bin Laden's suspected position, but withdrew because of uncertainty over the number of al-Qaeda fighters guarding bin Laden and a lack of support from allied Afghan troops.
_	According to Paul J. Murphy, a former USA counterterrorism official, the evidence that Al-Khattab was responsible for the apartment building bombings in Moscow is clear.
_	After the meal and despite the handicap of the facial wound, Wolfe delivers his speech on American cuisine, and — to the surprise of the gathered masters — continues by delivering the evidence that will convict Laszio's murderer and Wolfe's assailant.
_	In December 2012, she was sentenced to a two-year supervision and treatment order, the judge commenting that although some might feel she had "got away with it", the court had acted "in accordance with the law of the land and on the basis of the evidence that it hears".
_	In the literary sparrings between Bernard Lewis and Edward Said, who criticized Orientalist scholarship, claiming Lewis' work to be a prime example of Orientalism, in his 1978 book "Orientalism", Berque was among the scholars, such as Maxime Rodinson, Malcolm H. Kerr, Albert Hourani, and William Montgomery Watt, who maintained that Said's disregard for all the evidence that contradicted his narrative made "Orientalism" a deeply flawed account of Western scholarship.
_	When she tells Jean-Paul, he confesses everything to her, and she goes to see the evidence that would have given him away.
_	When presented with evidence of certain tribal customs by a friend, Dr. Donal Brody, Banda said that; "No one knows the hour, the date, the month or the year in which I was born, although I now accept the evidence that you give me – March or April 1898."
_	"More remarkable is the evidence that by the end of the second century Jude was widely accepted as canonical."
_	The report described the evidence that nerve agent was the cause of the sheep kill as "incontrovertible".
_	The head-banging "Gold," the hypnotic "4th Chamber" and the ice-smooth "Shadowboxing" add to the evidence that the Wu-Tang Clan are the kings of New York rap."
_	Belle's car is run off the road and the evidence that the toxic waste site causes cancer is stolen.
_	Tiffany provided the evidence that eBay had been notified "that some portion of the Tiffany goods sold on its website might be counterfeit."
_	Although Stiles wanted Shumway to tell people the truth so that they would know they had saved themselves, the reporter decides to maintain the illusion and not expose the secret, and destroys the evidence that Stiles had left for him to reveal.
_	If crossover products are observed, the evidence that the mechanism cannot be purely intramolecular is conclusive.
_	Coyle is concealing the evidence that the loan had been repaid long ago by Sir Edward's late father.
_	The programme reexamined the evidence that South Yorkshire Police had deliberately attempted to co-ordinate arrest statements in order to charge the miners with riot.
_	Gibbs answered, "No. I mean, the God's honest truth is no," because "nothing will assuage" those who continue to pursue what he called "made-up, fictional nonsense" despite the evidence that Obama had already provided.
_	Why on earth is it 'anti-Jewish' to conclude from the evidence that the standard numbers of Jews murdered are inaccurate, or that the Hitler regime, bad as it was in many ways, was not, in fact, intent on racial extermination?
_	In March 2015, on the occasion of the 16th anniversary of the beginning of NATO intervention, the Government of Serbia organized a ceremony in front of the ruined building which some observers interpreted as the evidence that the ruin has indeed become a de facto war monument.
_	The girls bury Elliott's lifeless body in the forest and with Mona's help hide all the evidence that links them to Rollins.
_	Denise starts to obsessively suspect that Zayday is the killer due to the evidence that she owns a chainsaw.
_	At his house, Gil receives a reporter's phone call congratulating him on the evidence that led to Richmond's arrest.
_	Outside the cave, the empty hollow remnants provide the evidence that there was a mandapa outside this cave.
_	However, the paper also examined court documents detailing the evidence that was to have been presented had Malone responded and a trial ensued.
_	Sami attempts to redeem herself, and with Nicole's help, Sami is able to secure the evidence that Kate and Eugenia had set her up, and she convinces Lucas that she was never unfaithful.
_	He buttressed this claim with the evidence that it was being built, in part, by Cuban workers.
_	The issue and his arguments are still debated today: in a re-examination in 2004, Olof Sundqvist substantially agreed, finding that "this paradigm [sacral kingship] implies a number of methodological difficulties"; Francis Oakley, however, argued in 2010 that although Baetke successfully rebutted the notion that Scandinavian kings were worshipped, he could not dismiss the evidence that they had some sacral status as mediators with the gods.
_	Despite the conjectural nature of reconstructions of the piece known as the Hurrian songs from the surviving score, the evidence that it used the diatonic scale is much more soundly based.
_	It was during this period that he gathered much of the evidence that used in his 1871 study of anxiety disorders.
_	In the case of Hezekiah, scholars have noted that the apparent inconsistencies are resolved by accepting the evidence that Hezekiah, like his predecessors for four generations in the kings of Judah, had a coregency with his father, and this coregency began in 729 BC.
_	They reported that twelve senior Anglican figures had concluded after looking at the evidence that "there had been a concerted move to take Patrick Sookhdeo down and destroy Barnabas Fund."
_	With respect to the finding that the murder was committed in an especially heinous, cruel, or depraved manner, the court observed that under its prior case law, the murder was cruel in light of the evidence that Powell had some uncertainty as to his ultimate fate, and the murder was depraved in light of the evidence that Walton had relished the killing.
_	These alterations in expression caused severely altered rhythmic behavior in eclosion of larvae, further substantiating the evidence that PDF modulates the rhythmic control of "Drosophila" behavior.
_	Those proposing the phrase, such as the chairman of the Texas State Board of Education (SBOE), Don McLeroy, purport that there are weaknesses in the theory of evolution and in the evidence that life has evolved that should be taught for a balanced treatment of the subject of evolution.
